The Principles of the most Ancient and Modern Philosophy

God, Christ, and Creatures

The Nature of Spirit and Matter

Anne Finch, Viscountess Conway

Copyright © Jonathan Bennett 2017. All rights reserved
[Brackets] enclose editorial explanations. Small ·dots· enclose material that has been added, but can be read as
though it were part of the original text. Occasional •bullets, and also indenting of passages that are not quotations,
are meant as aids to grasping the structure of a sentence or a thought. Every four-point ellipsis . . . . indicates the
omission of a brief passage that seems to present more difﬁculty than it is worth. Longer omissions are reported
within [brackets] in normal-sized type.—This work was posthumously published in a Latin translation, and the
original (English) manuscript was lost; so the Latin is all we have to work with.—The division into chapters and
sections is presumably Lady Conway’s; the titles of chapters 2–9 are not.
First launched: August 2009

Contents

Chapter 1: God and his divine attributes

Chapter 2: Creatures and time

Chapter 3: Freedom, inﬁnity, space

Chapter 4: Christ and creatures

Chapter 5: God, Christ, and time

Chapter 6: Change

1

3

5

10

11

15

Ancient and Modern Philosophy

Anne Finch, Viscountess Conway

Chapter 7: Body and spirit: arguments 1–3

Chapter 8: Body and spirit: arguments 4–6

Chapter 9: Other philosophers. Light. Life

26

38

43

Ancient and Modern Philosophy

Anne Finch, Viscountess Conway

1: God and his divine attributes

Chapter 1: God and his divine attributes

1. God is spirit, light, and life; he is inﬁnitely wise, good,
just, and strong; he knows everything, is present everywhere,
can do anything; he is the creator and maker of all things
visible and invisible.
2. Time doesn’t pass in God, nor does any change occur.
He doesn’t have parts that are arranged thus-and-so, ·giving
him a certain constitution·; indeed, he doesn’t have separate
parts. He is intrinsically self-containedly one—a being with
no variation and with nothing mixed into it. There are in God
no dark parts, no hints of anything to do with bodies, and
·therefore· nothing—nothing—in the way of form or image or
shape.
3. God is an essence or substance that is in the correct literal
·he is •one substance
sense distinct from his creatures:
and they are •others·; but he is not separated or cut off
from them—on the contrary he is closely and intimately and
intensely present in everything. Yet his creatures are not
parts of him; and they can’t change into him, any more than
he can change into them. He is also in the correct literal
sense the creator of all things, who doesn’t just give them
form and ﬁgure [i.e. shape them up in a certain way], but gives
them their essence—their life, their body, and anything else
they have that is good.
4. And because in God there is no time and ·therefore· no
change, God can’t ever have new knowledge or make a new
decision; his knowledge and his will [i.e. his decisions, choices,
wants] are eternal—outside time or beyond time.
5. Similarly, God has none of the passions that his creatures
come up with, because every passion is temporal: it starts at

a time and ends at a time. (I’m assuming here that we want
to use the term ‘passion’ correctly.)

6. In God there is an •idea that is his image, i.e. the •Word
that exists in him. In its substance or essence this ·idea
or word· is identical with God himself.
It is through this
idea or word that God knows himself as well as everything
else; all creatures were made or created according to it. [This
use of ‘word’ echoes the opening of John’s gospel: ‘In the beginning was
the Word, and the Word was with God, and the Word was God.’ In 4:2
(page 10) Lady Conway ingeniously links this use of ‘Word’ with the more
ordinary sense in which a ‘word’ is a bit of language.]

7. Similarly, there is spirit or will in God that •comes from
him and yet is one with him [= ‘identical with him’?]
in its
substance or essence. It is through this ·will· that creatures
receive their essence and activity: creatures have their
essence and existence purely from him because God—whose
will agrees with his utterly inﬁnite knowledge, wants them
to exist.
[That is: wants them to exist as the fundamental kinds
of things they are (‘essence’) and as having the detailed histories that
they do (‘activity’).] And thus God’s wisdom and will are not
entities or substances distinct from him, but distinct modes
or properties of a single substance. And this ·one substance
· is the very thing that the most knowledgeable and judicious
Christians are referring to when they speak of ‘the Trinity’.
·The standard account of the Trinity says that there are
•three persons in •one substance; but· the phrase ‘three
distinct persons’

•is a stumbling block and offence to Jews, Turks , and
other people,
•is actually without any reasonable sense, and

1

Ancient and Modern Philosophy

Anne Finch, Viscountess Conway

1: God and his divine attributes

•doesn’t occur anywhere in Scripture.

[Here and throughout this work, Lady Conway—like other writers at her
time—uses ‘Turks’ as a label for Moslems in general.] If that phrase
were omitted from the doctrine of the Trinity, what was left
would be readily accepted by everyone. For Jews and Turks
and the rest hardly deny that God has wisdom. . . . and has
within himself a Word by which he knows everything. And
when they concede that this same being gives all things their
essences, they have to accept that he has a will through
which something that was hidden in the idea is brought to
light and made actual—created and maintained—when God
creates and fashions a distinct and essential substance. This
is to create the essence of a creature. A creature doesn’t
get its existence from the idea alone, but rather from •will
and the idea conjointly; just as an architect’s idea of a
house doesn’t build the house unaided, i.e. without the co-
operation of the architect’s will. [Many philosophers would have
said that the essence of (say) you exists in God’s mind, independently of
his decision to bring you into existence, i.e. his decision to instantiate
that essence. We see here that Lady Conway thinks differently: she holds
that an essence doesn’t existent until something has it; so that God in
creating you created your essence.]

Notes added to chapter 1:

The last part of this chapter—especially section 7— is a
theme in the ancient writings of the Hebrews, thus:

(1) Since God was the most intense and inﬁnite light of
all things, as well as being the supreme good, he wanted
to create living beings with whom he could communicate.
But such creatures couldn’t possibly endure the very great
intensity of his light. These words of Scripture apply to this:
‘God dwells in inaccessible light. No-one has ever seen him,
etc.’ [1 Timothy 6:16].

(2) To make a ·safe· place for his creatures, God lessened
the highest degree of his intense light throughout a certain
space, like an empty sphere, a space for worlds.
(3) This empty space was not a merely negative item, a
non-thing like a gap in someone’s engagement-book. Rather,
it was an actual place where the light was not so bright. It
was the soul of the Messiah, known to the Hebrews as Adam
Kadmon [= ‘primal man’ or ‘ﬁrst man’]. . . .
(4) This soul of the Messiah was united with the entire divine
light that shone in the empty space—less brightly so that it
could be tolerated. This soul and light ·jointly· constituted
one entity.
(5) This Messiah (called ‘the Word’ and ‘the ﬁrst-born son of
God’), as soon as his light was dimmed for the convenience
of creatures, made from within himself the whole series of
•creatures.
(6) They were given access to the light of his divine nature, as
something for them to contemplate and love. This giving of
access united the creator with his creatures; the happiness
of the creatures lay in this union.
(7) That is why God is represented by the Trinity. ·There are
three concepts here, traditionally known as (f) the Father, (s)
the Son, and (h) the Holy Ghost.· Of these,

(f) is the inﬁnite God himself, considered as above and

beyond his creation;

(s) is that same God in his role as the Messiah;
(h) is the same God insofar as he is in creatures—in them
as the Messiah—with his light greatly dimmed so as
to adapt it to the perception of creatures.

This verse (John 1:18) is relevant: ‘(f) No man hath seen God
at any time; (s) the only begotten Son that is in the bosom of
the Father (h) hath declared him ·to us·.’
(8) But it is customary among the Hebrews to use the word

2

Ancient and Modern Philosophy

Anne Finch, Viscountess Conway

2: Creatures and time

‘person’ in this way: to them a ‘person’ is not an individual
substance but merely a concept for representing a species or
for considering a mode.

[This is the only chapter to which Lady Conway added Notes in
this fashion. But she has frequent references to one of the things that

underlay these Notes as well, namely works stemming from 13th century
Jewish mysticism known collectively as the Kabbalah. These references
are omitted from the present version, except for the two in the main text,
on page 11 and page 34..]

Chapter 2: Creatures and time

1. All creatures are or exist simply because God wants them
to: his will is inﬁnitely powerful, and his mere command can
give existence to creatures without

having any help,
using any means to the end of creation, or
having any material to work on.

Hence, since God’s will exists ·and acts· from eternity, it
follows necessarily that •creation results immediately, with
no time-lapse, from •the will to create.
[In the Latin text, the
author doesn’t ever address the reader directly, as she frequently does
in the present version. The reasons for that are purely stylistic.] But
don’t think that creatures are themselves co-eternal with
God; if you do, you’ll muddle together time and eternity.
Still, an act of God’s creative will is so immediately followed
by ·the start of the existence of· the creature that nothing
can intervene; like two circles that immediately touch each
other. And don’t credit creatures with having any other
source but God himself and his eternal will—the will that
follows the guidance of his eternal idea, his eternal wisdom.

It naturally follows from this that the time that has passed
since the moment of creation is inﬁnite; it doesn’t consist
of any number ·of minutes, hours or years·, or any number
that a created intellect can conceive. For how could it be
marked off or measured, when it has no other beginning
than eternity itself? [This stops a little short of the fairly common
early-modern view that although there are inﬁnitely many Fs, for various
values of F, there is no such thing as an inﬁnite number because that
phrase is self-contradictory.]
2. If you want to insist that time is ﬁnite, you are committed
to time’s having begun some deﬁnite number of years back:
perhaps 6,000 years ago (some people think it could hardly
be further back than that); or. . . .600,000 years ago (that is
accepted by some); or let it be any ﬁnite distance into the
past—perhaps inconceivably far back, but still at a deﬁnite
starting point T. Now tell me: Could the world have been
created earlier than it was? Could the world ·and therefore
time· have existed before T? If you say No, then you are
restricting the power of God to a certain number of years. If

3

Ancient and Modern Philosophy

Anne Finch, Viscountess Conway

2: Creatures and time

you say Yes, then you are allowing that there was time before
all times, that is a plain contradiction. [Lady Conway is evidently
equating how far back the world goes with how far back time goes. She
has spoken of ‘time that has passed since the moment of creation’, and
she will do so again; but it’s pretty clear that she equates this with ‘time
that has passed’.]
3. On this basis we can easily answer a question that has
greatly worried many people:

Did creation occur—could it have occurred—from
eternity. . . .?

·There are two answers to this, corresponding to two ways
of understanding ‘from eternity’·. Taking the question to be
asking ‘Has the created world existed for an inﬁnite number
of times?’, the answer is Yes. But if the question is asking
’Is the created world eternal in the way that God is eternal,
meaning that it didn’t ever have a beginning?’, the answer is
No. There’s nothing surprising in the view that times—the
totality of them, taken all together—are inﬁnite. It is, after
all, conceivable that even the smallest stretch of time has
something inﬁnite about it: just as no time is so long that a
still longer one can’t be conceived, so also no time is so short
that an even shorter time can’t be imagined. . . .
4. The inﬁnity of time from the beginning of creation can
likewise be proved by the goodness of God. For God is
inﬁnitely good, loving, and generous; indeed, he is goodness
and charity—the inﬁnite fountain and ocean of goodness,
charity, and generosity. How could that fountain not ﬂow. . . .
perpetually? Won’t that ocean perpetually overﬂow for the
production of creatures, and be continuously in ﬂood ·for
their beneﬁt·? God’s goodness communicates itself and
makes itself grow; that is its nature. It can’t be ampliﬁed
by anything outside God, anything making up for some
lack in him; because there isn’t anything that he lacks—he
is too absolutely complete for that. And since he can’t

augment himself, because that would be the creating of many
Gods, which is a contradiction, it necessarily follows that
he brought creatures into existence from time everlasting,
i.e. through a numberless sequence of periods. Otherwise
the goodness communicated by God, which is his essential
attribute, would indeed be ﬁnite and could be numbered in
terms of years. Nothing is more absurd.
5. So God’s essential attribute is to be a creator. God always
was a creator, therefore, and he always will be one, because
otherwise he would change; and there always have been
creatures, and there always will be. The eternity of creatures
is nothing but the inﬁnity of times in which they have existed
and always will exist. This inﬁnity of times is not the same
as God’s inﬁnite eternity, because there’s nothing temporal
about the divine eternity: nothing in it can be called past or
future; it is always entirely present. God is in time, but he
isn’t contained in it.. . . .
6. Why is the inﬁnity of time different from God’s eternity?
The answer is obvious. ·On the one hand·:

Time is nothing but the successive motion or opera-
tion of creatures; if they stopped moving or operating,
time would come to an end, and the creatures would
go out of existence because it is the ·essential· nature
of every creature to move in its progression towards
greater perfection.

Whereas ·on the other hand·:

In God there is no successive motion, no process
of growing in perfection, because he is absolutely
perfect ·already·; so there are no times in God or in
his eternity.

·And there is another reason too·: there are no •parts in God,
so there are no •times in him, because all times have parts
and are—as I said earlier—inﬁnitely divisible.

4

Ancient and Modern Philosophy

Anne Finch, Viscountess Conway

3: Freedom, inﬁnity, space

Chapter 3: Freedom, inﬁnity, space

1. If we consider the divine attributes that I have mentioned,
especially God’s •wisdom and his •goodness, then we can
utterly refute—we can destroy—the indifference of the will
that has been attributed to God (and wrongly called ‘free will’)
by the Scholastics and by other so-called philosophers. [An
‘indifferent’ will, in the sense at work here, is one that has no greater tug
in any direction than in any other.] God’s will is indeed utterly free:
just because he is free and acts spontaneously in whatever
he does, anything he does in regard to his creatures is done
without any external force or compulsion and without any
causal input from the creatures. But he is not—repeat
not—ever indifferent about whether or not to act;
if he
were, that would be an imperfection, making God like his
corruptible creatures! This indifference of will is the basis
for all changeability and corruptibility in creatures; ·I run
those two together because· there would be nothing wrong in
creatures if they weren’t changeable. [The word ‘corruptible’ as
used here is tied to Latin corruptio and early modern English ‘corruption’,
usually referring in a general way to the condition of being rotten, spoiled,
gone wrong.] Crediting God with that indifference of will
would be implying that he is changeable, and thus is like
corruptible man, who often acts from sheer will, with no
true and solid reason. i.e. no guidance from wisdom. That
likens God to cruel tyrants who mostly act from their own
sheer will, relying on their power and not being able to
give any explanation for their actions except ‘I chose to
In contrast with that, any good man can give a
do it’.
suitable explanation for what he does or will do, because
he understands that true goodness and wisdom require him
to have such an explanation; so he wants to act as he does
because it is right and he knows that if he doesn’t he will be

neglecting his duty.
2. True justice or goodness, therefore, is not indifferent;
there’s no slack in it. Rather, it is like a straight line: there
can’t be two or more equally straight lines between two
points; only one line between them can be straight, and all
others must be curved—more or less, depending on how
much they depart from the straight line. So it is obvious that
this indifference of will, which is an imperfection, has no
place in God. For this reason God is both a most •free agent
and a most •necessary one: anything that he does in relation
to his creatures is something that he must do, because his
inﬁnite wisdom, goodness, and justice are for him a law that
can’t be broken.
3.
It clearly follows that God •was not indifferent about
whether or not to bring creatures into existence, and that he
•made them from an inner impulse of his divine goodness
and wisdom. So he created worlds—i.e. created creatures—
as promptly as he could, because it’s the nature of a neces-
sary agent to do as much as he can. Since he could have
created worlds or creatures from time immemorial, before
6,000—before 60,000—before 600,000—years ago, he has
done this. God can do anything that doesn’t imply a contra-
diction. ‘Worlds or creatures will exist continuously through
an inﬁnite time in the future’—there’s nothing contradictory
about that; so there’s no contradiction, either, in ‘Worlds or
creatures have existed continuously through an inﬁnite past
time’.
4. From these divine attributes, properly understood, it
follows that God has made an inﬁnity of worlds or creatures.
He is inﬁnitely powerful, so there can’t be any number n

5

Ancient and Modern Philosophy

Anne Finch, Viscountess Conway

3: Freedom, inﬁnity, space

of creatures such that God couldn’t create more than n
creatures. And, as we have seen, he does as much as he
can. His will, goodness, and kindness certainly extend. . . .as
far as his power does. Thus it clearly follows that he has
inﬁnitely many creatures of inﬁnitely many different types,
so that they can’t be counted or measured, either of which
would set a limit to them. Suppose that the universe of
creatures is spherical and is this big:

Its radius is n times the diameter of the earth, where
n is the number of grains of dust in the entire world.
And suppose that its ultimate parts, its atoms, are this small:

A single poppy seed contains 100,000 atoms.

·That yields an immensely large ﬁnite number of very small
atoms; but· it can’t be denied that God with his inﬁnite power
could make this number greater and greater by multiplying
to inﬁnity. . . . And since (as I have said) God is a necessary
agent who does everything that he can do, it follows that
he did and always does multiply and increase the •essences
of creatures to inﬁnity [i.e. increase to inﬁnity how many •creatures
there are; see the note on ‘essences’ in 1:7].

5. The same argument shows that not only the universe (or
system of creatures) as a whole is inﬁnite, i.e. •has inﬁnity
in itself, but every creature •has inﬁnity in it. A creature
may be the smallest we can see with our eyes, or ·even·
the smallest we can conceive of in our minds, but it •has
in itself an uncountable inﬁnity of parts, or rather of entire
creatures. It can’t be denied that God can put one creature
inside another; so he could just as easily put in two, or
four, or eight, endlessly multiplying creatures by always
placing smaller creatures inside larger ones. And since no
creature could be so small that there couldn’t be a smaller
one, no creature is so big that an even bigger one isn’t
always possible.
[That’s what the Latin means, but this may be a

slip by that translator. It would be more reasonable for Lady Conway to
say at this point: Just as no creature could be so small etc., so also no
It follows
creature is so big etc.’—a comparison, not an inference.]
•that inﬁnitely many creatures can be contained in any
creature, however tiny, and •that all these could be bodies
and mutually impenetrable. As for created spirits, which
can penetrate one another: any one of these can ‘contain’
inﬁnitely many others, which all have the same extent—·the
same spatial size·—as one another and as the spirit that
‘contains’ them. What happens here is that the spirits are
more ﬁnely divided and more spiritual, which enables them
to penetrate items that are less ﬁnely divided, more lumpy,
more corporeal; so there’s no shortage of space to force
some of them to give way so as to make room for others.
I’ll say more about the nature of bodies and spirits in the
proper place [Chapter 7, starting at page 26]. All I need here is to
demonstrate that in every creature, whether spirit or body,
there is an inﬁnity of creatures, each of which contains an
inﬁnity in itself.
[Four comments on section 5:
(a) In early modern English, and the
corresponding Latin, a ‘creature’ was simply something created by God,
so that a pebble could be a creature. But early in section 5 we see
the phrase ‘an inﬁnity of parts, or rather of entire creatures’, apparently
taking ‘a creature’ to be more than merely something God has created.
In other contexts, notably on page 9, Lady Conway clearly regards all
(b) In this section and else-
created things of any kind as ‘creatures’.
where, subtilis and grossus—standardly translated by ‘subtle’ and ‘gross’
respectively—are translated by ‘ﬁnely divided’ and ‘lumpy’ or ‘not ﬁnely
divided’ respectively. These are what Lady Conway means by them, and
are indeed closer to the meanings of the Latin words. (c) When speaking
of the packing of bodies into bodies, our author speaks of these bodies as
being ‘mutually impenetrable’; she means that no two bodies can each
occupy the whole of a given region of space at the same time; so the
packing has to be done by body x having tunnels or crevices into which

6

Ancient and Modern Philosophy

Anne Finch, Viscountess Conway

3: Freedom, inﬁnity, space

the parts of body y can creep, and of course y in its turn having still
smaller tunnels or crevices into which the parts of body z can creep,
and. . . so on. And that must also be her view about the packing of
spirits into spirits, the only difference here being that all those tunnels
and crevices must be smaller than many of those of bodies. Given that
the subtle/gross difference is the whole difference between bodies and
spirits, it seems that a certain distance along the body-packing process
we’ll be dealing with such tiny tunnels and such tiny portions of body to
slide into them that really we are dealing with spirits. If that is right, it
seems to be something our author overlooked. You might think that it
isn’t right, and that for spirits she envisages a different kind of packing,
involving something she calls ‘intimate presence’. (This has ﬂoated past
rather quickly a few times, but we’ll hear much about it later on.) To say
that x is ‘intimately present’ to y is to say that x and y each occupy
the whole of some region of space at the same time.
If that is how
spirits contain other spirits which. . . and so on to inﬁnity, there is no
need for tunnels etc. and no threat that somewhere down the line the
body-packings will turn into spirit-packings. But that can’t possibly
be Lady Conway’s view, because it implies a radical difference of kind
between bodies and spirits, whereas this entire work is dedicated to the
thesis that the body/spirit difference is only one of degree—speciﬁcally, a
difference along the continuum from extremely ﬁnely divided to crudely
chunky. And also because, as we shall see on page 33, Lady Conway
declares—ﬁrmly, clearly, and for given reasons—that no created thing or
substance can be intimately present to anything else. (d) The whole idea
of inserting the parts of one body into tunnels, crevices or gaps in another
body makes no sense unless that tunnels etc. are otherwise empty, but
on page 35 and elsewhere Lady Conway emphatically declares that there
is no such thing as empty space. This seems to be a deep and important
ﬂaw in her thinking.]

6. All these things praise and commend God’s great power
and goodness—the way his inﬁnity appears radiantly in the
works of his hands, right down to every single one of his

7

creatures. (You might think: ‘·This can’t be right, because it
puts inﬁnity into us, putting· us on a par with God.’ That is
wrong, because just as one inﬁnity is greater than another,
so God is always inﬁnitely greater than all his creatures;
nothing can be compared to him.) Thus, God’s truly invisible
attributes can be clearly seen by being understood through
the things he has made or in the things he has made. The
greater and more magniﬁcent his works, the more they show
the maker’s greatness. Some people hold •that there’s only
a ﬁnite number of creatures in the universe, so that they
are countable, and •that the whole body of the universe
occupies so many acres or miles or diameters of the earth in
length, depth, and breadth. They are estimating God’s great
majesty according to a petty and undigniﬁed scale. They are
telling a tale not about God but about an idol of their own
imagination, whom they conﬁne to a narrow space, like the
tiny bird-cage a few inches wide; isn’t that a fair description
of the world they imagine, when it’s compared to the true
and great universe that I have described?
7. They may say this:

We don’t conﬁne God within this ﬁnite universe. We
take him to exist within it and also in the inﬁnite
spaces that we imagine outside it.

But if those imagined spaces are merely imaginary, they’re
nothing but idle ﬁctions; and if they are real entities, what
else can they be but creatures of God? Also, either God is
at work in those spaces or he isn’t. If he isn’t, he isn’t there;
because God works wherever he is—it’s his nature to act,
just as it’s the nature of ﬁre to burn or of the sun to shine.
For God always works, and his work is bringing creatures
into existence according to the eternal idea or wisdom that
is in him. . . .

Ancient and Modern Philosophy

Anne Finch, Viscountess Conway

3: Freedom, inﬁnity, space

8. Moreover this continual action or operation of God,
considered as something that is in him, i.e. comes from
him, or considered in relation ·only· to himself, is just one
continual action or command of his will. There is nothing
serial or temporal in it, no before or after; it is always all
present to God; nothing ·in it· is past or future, because God
has no parts. But considered as manifested in creatures, or
as operating on creatures, God’s action is temporal and has
a series of parts. It’s hard for us to imagine this or to grasp it
conceptually, but there is a good solid reason for afﬁrming it.
Perhaps we can be helped a little in our attempts to grasp it
by thinking of a great wheel rotating around its centre while
the centre remains in the same place. Or think of

the sun, which is made to rotate around its centre by
some angel or spirit who is in its centre, producing n
rotations every m days. The centre moves the whole
thing, producing a great and continual motion; yet the
centre remains always motionless, and isn’t moved in
any way.

How much more true this is of God, who is the ﬁrst mover
of all his creatures, giving them their true and appointed
·It is appropriate to
motions! But they don’t move him.
use the wheel/sun examples in this way, because· •the rule
of God’s will is the analogue in him of •the motions and
operations of creatures. But ·this is only an analogy·: strictly
speaking, there is no motion ·in God· because all motion is
successive. . . .

9. I have maintained that the smallest creatures that can be
conceived have inﬁnitely many creatures within themselves,
so that the smallest particles of body or matter can be
stretched and divided in inﬁnite ways into ever-smaller
parts. Some people have objected to this, ·opposing it with
atomism·, as follows:

(1) Whatever is actually divisible as far as any actual

division can go is divisible into indivisible parts.

(2) And matter is actually divisible as far as any actual

division can go.

(3) Therefore, matter is divisible into indivisible parts.

[•Where the above argument has ‘indivisible’, it’s clear from the Latin
that Lady Conway used ‘indiscerpible’. It means the same thing, but was
a technical term invented by her friend and mentor Henry More; she was
signalling that she was starting to move away from his philosophy. •In
premise (2) the word ‘matter’ replaces ’matter or body (which is of course
just packed-together matter)’. •She abbreviates (3) the conclusion to
‘Therefore etc.’]
This argument suffers from the fallacy that logicians call
combining uncombinables, i.e. joining words or terms that
·jointly· imply contradiction or absurdity. This fallacy is
lurking in the phrase actually divisible, which says that one
and the same thing is and is not divided. For ‘actually’
signiﬁes division, while ‘divisible’ signiﬁes not division but
the capacity to be divided. ·Combining these into a single
phrase· is as absurd and contradictory as ‘seeingly blind’
or ‘vitally dead’. And if the objectors ·clear themselves of
this fallacy by· using the phrase ‘actually divisible’ to mean
just one of those two things—i.e. either to refer only to (a)
what really has been divided or to refer to (b) what is ·merely·
capable of being divided, a ·different· fallacy will be readily
apparent to us. (a) If the objectors use ‘actually divisible’ to
refer only to what has been divided, then I grant them their
premise

(1a): Whatever has been actually divided as far as
any actual division can go is divisible into indivisible
parts.

But in that case their premise

(2a) Matter has been actually divided as far as any
actual division can go

8

Ancient and Modern Philosophy

Anne Finch, Viscountess Conway

3: Freedom, inﬁnity, space

is false.
(b) If they use ‘actually divisible’ to refer only to
whatever is merely divisible, i.e. is capable of being divided,
then I deny the premise

(1b) Whatever can be divided as far as any actual
division can go is divisible into indivisible parts.

And anyway the proposition when taken in this sense it is
a mere tautology, an empty repetition of the same thing.
[What proposition? She is referring to the opening clause of premise
(1), namely ‘whatever can be divided as far as any actual division ·of it·
·An
can go’, contending that everything answers to that description.]
argument based on· it is on a par with:

•Whatever can be removed from its place as far as it
can be removed can be removed only up to a certain
distance;
•London can be removed from its place as far as it can
be removed.
•Therefore etc.

The same form of argument can be used to ‘prove’ that
the human soul exists or has its essence for ·only· a ﬁnite
number of years, so that it is mortal, comes to an end:

•Anything whose time or duration is actually divisible
to the extent to which an actual division ·of it· can be
made will come to an end, and is divisible into a ﬁnite
number of years;
•The soul’s time or duration is actually divisible to the
extent to which an actual division ·of it· can be made;
•Therefore etc.

. . . . Please note that when I say that the smallest particle
of body or so-called matter is always divisible into even
smaller parts to inﬁnity, so that there can’t be any actual
division in matter that couldn’t be carried still further, I’m
not specifying what God’s power will be or is •absolutely able
to do. (Some people do do that; their behaviour is crass and

stupid.) I am only indicating what God’s power does and will
do •insofar as it operates in creatures and through creatures
in all its productive activities [see note on ‘creature’ on page 6];
the point being that in all analyses and divisions of bodies
nature never has—i.e. creatures never have—divided any
body into parts so small that they couldn’t be further divided.
And the body of any creature can’t ever be reduced to its
smallest parts—not through the most ﬁne-grained operations
of any creature or created power. And that’s enough for my
present purpose. For God doesn’t make divisions in any
body or matter except by working together with his creatures.
Therefore he never reduces creatures to their smallest parts.
[Despite the word ‘Therefore’, Lady Conway abruptly shifts to an entirely
different reason why God doesn’t actually go the whole way is dividing
any of his creatures. Namely:] It’s because it is the nature of all
motion that it breaks down and divides something into ﬁner
parts; so if a material thing were broken down into its ﬁnest
parts, no motion could occur in it. Bringing that about would
be contrary to God’s wisdom and goodness. Any creature in
which all motion or operation had ceased would be entirely
useless in creation—it would be no better than nothing. And,
I repeat, for God to be unable to do something would be
contrary to God’s wisdom, his goodness, and all his other
attributes. . . .

10. ‘Everything is inﬁnitely divisible, always divisible into
ever-smaller parts’—this isn’t an empty or useless theory;
on the contrary, it’s extremely useful in the understanding
the causes and reasons of things and in understanding that
all creatures, from the highest to the lowest, are inseparably
united thus:

They send out from themselves ·some of· their more
ﬁnely divided parts. These are mediators: they in-
tervene between one creature and another, enabling

9

Ancient and Modern Philosophy

Anne Finch, Viscountess Conway

4: Christ and creatures

them to act on one another at great distances.

This is the basis of all the sympathy and antipathy that
occurs in creatures. Someone who has a good grasp of these
things can easily see into the most secret and hidden causes

of most things, which ignorant men call ‘occult qualities’. [It’s
pretty clear that Lady Conway thinks that ‘sympathy’ and ‘antipathy’ are
also terms used by ignorant people who accept fake explanations of facts
that are really to be explained in terms of the physics of tiny particles.]

Chapter 4: Christ and creatures

1. People have puzzled over the question ‘Did God create all
creatures at the same time or one after the other?’ What I
have said makes it easy to answer this, ·as follows·. (1) If
‘create’ refers to •God himself, i.e. to an internal decree of his
will, then the creation occurred all at once, because it’s the
nature and essential attribute of God to be unchangeable
(2) If ‘create’ refers to •the creatures, ·i.e. to
and eternal.
what happens to them·, then the creation was spread out
through time, because it’s the nature of God’s creatures to be
changeable and temporal. (3) If ‘create’ refers to the universal
seeds and sources that are like springs and fountains from
which creatures ﬂow forth in an orderly series ﬁxed by God
(the greatest and ﬁrst source of all things), then again it
can be said that all creatures were created at the same
time, especially if we remember the Messiah, i.e. the Christ,
who is the ﬁrst born of all creatures. . . .and through whom
‘all things visible and invisible have been made’ (Colossians
1:16).

2.
‘Jesus Christ’ signiﬁes the whole Christ, who is both
God and man. As God, he is called logos ousios [Greek],
meaning ‘the essential Word of the father’. As man, he is
named by logos prophorikos [Greek], meaning the word that

is uttered and revealed, the perfect and substantial image
[= ‘likeness’] of God’s word. This revealed word is eternally in
God, perpetually united to him; it is his vehicle, his ‘organ’,
just as our body is the vehicle or organ of our soul. Both
the Old and New Testaments mention this revealed word,
which is the wisdom of God: for example, Proverbs 8:22, 31
and 3:19; Psalms 33:6, 22:2 and 110 (ﬁrst part), Job 1:1,2,3,
etc.; Ephesians 3:9, Colossians 1:15–17. The last of those
passages contains an explanation of the underlying truth
that that through the Son. . . .God can’t be known exactly,
barely, without decoration, as he is. Nor can any of his
attributes. ·We are told that the Son is the perfect image of
the Father, and· and ‘image’ signiﬁes something visible that
represents something else. So the Son is the visible image of
the invisible God, and of God’s equally invisible attributes;
·which is why he can’t present God or his attributes exactly,
barely, just as they are; but· he (the Son) represents God in
some very special way ·that somehow makes it clear that he
is representing •God· rather than •any created thing.

3. And the same line of thought is at work when Paul, writing
to the Colossians, calls Christ ‘the ﬁrst of all created beings’
and describes how Christ related to creatures, who, in their

10

Ancient and Modern Philosophy

Anne Finch, Viscountess Conway

5: God, Christ, and time

original state were all like the sons of God. At that time he
was ‘the ﬁrst born’ of all the •sons, and •they were the sons,
so to speak, of that ﬁrstborn son of God. That’s why I said
that all things are rooted in him, i.e. have their existence in
him, because they arise from him in the way branches arise
from a root, so that they remain forever in him in a certain
way.

4. Created things couldn’t be equal to Christ, couldn’t have
the same nature that he has. That is because his nature
could never sink to their level, changing from good into bad.
So their nature is far inferior to his; they can never strictly
speaking become him, any more than he can ever become
the Father. The highest point they can reach is be like him,
as Scripture says. Thus, we as mere creatures are only his
sons and daughters by adoption.

Chapter 5: God, Christ, and time

1. After what I have said in the preceding chapter about
the son of God, who is the ﬁrst born of all creatures, there
is still much more to be said on this topic. I shall devote
this chapter to saying it, because it is needed for a correct
understanding of what follows. Regarding Jesus Christ (as
I call him, following Scripture): in calling him ‘the son of
God, (the ﬁrst born of all creatures’, I imply that •he was
eternally uniﬁed with God not only in •his divinity but also
in •his humanity, i.e. that his celestial humanity was united
with God before the creation of the world and before •his
incarnation [i.e. before he became a man equipped with ﬂesh and bone
etc.]. The ancient Kabbalists [see note on page 3] wrote many
things about this: how the son of God was created; how his
existence preceded all creatures in the order of nature; how
everything is blessed and sanctiﬁed in him and through him.
The Kabbalists in their writings call him ‘the celestial Adam’,
or ‘Adam Kadmon’ (the ﬁrst man), ‘the great priest’, ’the
husband (or betrothed) of the church’, or. . . .‘the ﬁrst-born
son of God’.

[We are about to hear a lot about Christ’s position as a medium (Latin)
between God and creatures. This is hard to translate. It does not mean
‘mediator’ in anything like our present sense; the Latin word for that is
mediator. A mediator is someone who has a

role as a go-between;

whereas Lady Conway’s topic here is Christ’s

position as a be-between,

so to speak. It is a position that he occupies because he shares attributes
with God and other attributes with Creatures. This version will use
the English ‘medium’ for the noun, and ‘intermediate’ for the related
adjective; this is not a standard use of ‘medium’, but at least it avoids
the strong wrong suggestions of the word ‘mediator’.]

2. This son of God, the ﬁrst born of all creatures, this
celestial Adam and great priest as the most learned Jews
call him, is properly described as the medium between God
and created things. The existence of such a medium can be
•demonstrated as well as the existence of God can; all that is
needed is to grasp that the medium’s nature is below God’s

11

Ancient and Modern Philosophy

Anne Finch, Viscountess Conway

5: God, Christ, and time

but above, more excellent than, all other created things. This
excellence makes it right for us to call him the son of God.

3. In order to grasp the •demonstration ·that I have referred
to·, think about

(1) the nature or essence of God, the highest being

and

(3) the nature and essence of creatures.

These are so unlike each other that (2) this intermediate
nature springs into view. ·To be really sure about it, there are
some things we should go through in patient detail·. (1) As I
have already said, God’s nature—his essence—is altogether
unchangeable; we are shown this by sacred Scripture and by
our understanding (which was placed in our minds by God).
·Here’s what our understanding tells us about this.· If God
were in any way changeable, it would have to be a change
in the direction of a more wide-ranging and more intense
goodness. But if that were possible for him, he wouldn’t
already be the highest good, and that’s a contradiction.
Furthermore, if anything proceeds to a greater degree of
goodness, that’s because it is sharing in the inﬂuence and
the virtue of some greater being; no being is greater than
God; so he can’t improve or be made better in any way. . . .
Therefore it is clear that God, or the highest being, is wholly
unchangeable.

·So much for God; now for creatures·. The nature of crea-
tures is really distinct from the nature of God: he has certain
attributes that can’t be shared with his creatures, and his
unchangeableness is one of these; from which is necessarily
follows that creatures are changeable—an ‘unchangeable
creature’ would have to be God himself! And, anyway, daily
experience teaches us that creatures are changeable and
continually change their state.

Now, there are two kinds of changeability.

To be

changeable1 is to have the intrinsic power to change oneself
for better or for worse; all creatures have this power except
for the ﬁrst-born of all creatures, ·Jesus Christ·. To be
changeable2 is to have the power of changing from one good
to another—·including changing from good to better·— but
not of changing in any other way. So there are three kinds
of being.

•First kind: altogether unchangeable.
•Second kind: changeable2; can change toward the
good, so that something good by its very nature can
become better.
•Third kind: changeable1; can change from good to ·a
different or greater· good as well as from good to bad.

The ﬁrst and third of these kinds are opposites. The second
is a natural medium—a very ﬁtting and appropriate one—
between those extremes: it shares with the third kind the
ability to change, and it shares with the ﬁrst kind an inability
to change from good to bad. Such a medium is required
by the very nature of things: without it, there would be a
gap, and one extreme would be united [meaning?] with the
other extreme without any medium ·or intermediate case·,
which is impossible and against the nature of things (as can
be seen all through the entire universe). I am talking here
about the Messiah’s •moral unchangeability, not his •natural
unchangeability. Some people object that if Christ had been
naturally incapable of changing ·for the worse·, it would
have been pointless to tempt him (see Matthew 4:3, Hebrews
2:17–18, 4:15). But there are other arguments—purely
philosophical ones—that the perfect ﬁrst born emanated
immediately from God at the beginning (and that only he
did).This is also conﬁrmed in chapters 2 above and 7 below
by the authority of ancient and modern philosophers, along
with a response to opposing arguments.

12

Ancient and Modern Philosophy

Anne Finch, Viscountess Conway

5: God, Christ, and time

4. Don’t understand this ‘medium’ in a crude way, as being
spatially between, like your trunk coming between your head
and your feet. It is intermediate in respect ·not of its location
but· of its nature, just as silver is intermediate between tin
and gold, and water between air and earth, though silver and
water are crude analogues of the medium I am discussing.
No-one supposes that the son is intermediate between God
and creatures in the sense ·of being a kind of stand-in for
God·, implying that God himself is not immediately present in
all creatures. Indeed, he is immediately present in all things
and immediately ﬁlls all things, and he works immediately
in everything. I mean those words strictly literally; but they
must be understood in terms of the kind of union and com-
munication that creatures have with God, where God works
in everything immediately and yet using this medium that I
have been talking about as an instrument through which he
works together with creatures, since that instrument is by its
own nature closer to them. (Still, because that medium is by
its nature far more excellent than all the other productions of
God that we call ‘creatures’, it is rightly called ‘the ﬁrst born
of all creatures’ and ‘the son of God’ rather than a ‘creature’
of God. And it is produced by generation or emanation from
God rather than by ‘creation’ strictly speaking: we say that
the son of man [a phrase here making its ﬁrst appearance in this
work] was generated by God rather than made or created
by him; we say that a house or a ship is the ‘work’ of its
maker but not his ‘son’: it isn’t a living image and likeness of
him, ·as a son may be of his father·. Thus, the ﬁrst creation
produced outside of God is more ﬁttingly and properly called
his ‘son’ than his ‘creature’, because it is his living image
and is greater and more excellent than all creatures. But as
long as we understand the facts correctly, there’s no point
in arguing about words.)
It follows that the son himself
is ·also· immediately present in all these creatures so that

he may bless and beneﬁt them. And by existing among
creatures and being the true medium between them and
God, he actively raises them into union with God. And since
he is the most excellent creature produced outside of God,
as well as being his most exact and perfect image, he must
resemble God in all his attributes, which can be said without
contradiction to have been passed on to •Christ; so •he must
be present everywhere. And here’s another argument for
that conclusion: if Christ were not present everywhere in all
creatures, there would be an utter chasm between God and
creatures—a gap in which God would not exist. And that
is absurd. [In talking about the ‘medium’ between God and creatures,
this version of the text has shifted from ‘it’ and ‘itself’ to ‘he’ and ‘him’ and
‘himself’. Latin doesn’t have this distinction; the basis for the change is
just the gradual development of what sounds like a personal role for the
medium, and the increasing use of ‘son’.]

5. Now a different point. Because he shares in God’s
unchangeability and creatures’ changeability, the son is
midway between what is altogether unchangeable and what
is altogether changeable, sharing something with each. So
he can be said to share eternity (which belongs to God) and
time (which belongs to creatures). I said earlier [page 3] that
nothing intervenes between eternity and time, or between
the creating will of God and the creatures that he makes;
but in that context ‘time’ and ‘creature’ must be understood
in a broader sense in which this medium, ·this Son·, counts
as one of the creatures and as being in time along with
the rest. We mustn’t think of this intervening being, ·this
Son·, as existing •in time before ·all other· creatures, but
only as preceding them in •the order of nature. Thus,
strictly speaking no time elapsed between creatures and
the all-creating power and will of God that created them.
6. But using ‘time’ in the ordinary sense of the word,

13

Ancient and Modern Philosophy

Anne Finch, Viscountess Conway

5: God, Christ, and time

referring to a successive increase or decrease of things during
which they grow for a while and then decline until they die or
change into another state, we can say ﬂatly that neither •this
medium nor any ·other· creature that is perfectly united to
•him is subject to time and to its laws. That’s because the
laws of time hold only for a certain period, and when that
is completed the things subject to time decline, waste away,
and die or change into another kind of thing altogether. As
the ancient poet [Ovid] said:
‘Voracious time and envious
age destroy everything.’ That is why time is divided into
four parts, following the ages of men living in this world:
infancy, youth, manhood, and old age. Thus, everything that
is circumscribed by time is subject to death and decay or
changes into something else, just as we see water change
into stone, stones into earth, earth into trees, and trees
into living animals.
[That water could be changed into stone was
proclaimed as a discovery by F. M. van Helmont, Lady Conway’s friend
and mentor. We meet this again on pages 16 and 20.]

But in that most excellent intermediate being ·whom we
call ‘the son of God’· there is no defect or decay; and properly
speaking death has no place in him either. He is like a most
powerful and effective ointment through which anything can
be preserved from decline and death; whatever is joined with
him is always new and vigorously growing. Here is perpetual
youth without old age but with the virtues of age, namely
great increase of wisdom and experience without any of the
imperfections that old age normally brings.

Yet when Christ became ﬂesh and entered his body, which
he brought with him from heaven (for every created spirit
has some body, whether it is terrestrial, aerial, or etherial),
he took on something of our nature and thus of the nature
of everything. (Why ‘thus of everything’? Because the nature
of man contains the nature of all creatures, which is why
man is called a microcosm [= ’a small-scale model of the universe’]).

In taking on ﬂesh and blood, Christ sanctiﬁed nature so
that he could sanctify everything, analogous to fermenting
a whole mass of stuff by fermenting one part of it. Then
he descended into time and for a certain period voluntarily
subjected himself to its laws, to such an extent that he
suffered great torment and death itself. But death didn’t
hold him for long: on the third day he rose again, and the
purpose of all his suffering, right up to his death and burial,
was to heal, preserve, and restore creatures from the decay
and death that had come upon them through the Fall. [This
is Lady Conway’s ﬁrst mention of mankind’s ‘fall’ from innocence down
into sinfulness (represented in the Bible by Adam’s sin of disobedience in
Eden); it is far from being the last.] By doing this he brought time
to an end, and raised creatures above time, raising them to
·the level· where he dwells—he who is the same yesterday,
today, and forever, without loss, decay, or death. Similarly,
through his spiritual and inward appearance in men he
saves, preserves, and restores their souls, and subjects
himself to suffering and death (as it were), and for a while
he submits himself to the laws of time so that he may raise
the souls of men above time and corruption, up to himself,
in whom they receive blessing and in whom they gradually
grow in goodness, virtue, and holiness forever.

7. For this reason, those who achieve a perfect union with
Christ are raised to a region of perfect tranquility, where
nothing is seen or felt to move or be moved. Extremely
strong and swift motions do occur there, but they are so
smooth, uniform and harmonious—with no resistance or
disturbance—that they appear to be completely at rest. In
the external world ·down at our present level· we ﬁnd many
examples of motion that our eyesight doesn’t detect: where
the motion is too fast to be seen, and where it is too slow;
so that we can perceive only the middle kind. So the laws of

14

Ancient and Modern Philosophy

Anne Finch, Viscountess Conway

6: Change

time apply not only to earth and earthly things ·and visible
motions· but also to the sun, moon, stars, and to all the
parts of the universe that we can see along with many that
we can’t. In the course of time, all these things can change
into things of very different kinds, which happens through
the same process and order of the divine operation that

God gave to all things as law or justice. For in his divine
wisdom he has decided to reward every creature according
to its works. But that’s enough for just now about this most
excellent intermediate being. I’ll have occasion to say more
about him further on.

Chapter 6: Change

1. The difference between God and creatures, rightly consid-
ered, shows pretty well that the nature of all [omnes] creatures
can change; and our everyday experience conﬁrms this. Now,
take any [aliqui] creature you like: if it can change, it must
owe its changeability simply to its being a creature; and from
this it follows that all [omnes] creatures are changeable. Why?
Because of this law:

Whatever ﬁts any [aliqui] thing because it belongs to
a certain species ﬁts everything [omnes] belonging to
that species.

. . . .If this weren’t so, there wouldn’t be any distinction
between God and creatures. God’s unchangeability is one of
his attributes that can’t be shared with anything else, so any
‘creature’ that was unchangeable would be God!

2. How far does this changeability go? Can one individual
be changed into another individual (whether of the same
species or a different one)? I say that this is impossible: if it
happened, then things would change their essences, which
would cause great confusion not only for creatures but also
for the wisdom of God, which made everything. ·Confusion

for God’s wisdom·: If, for example, Paul could change into
Judas or Judas into Paul, then the punishment for a sin
would fall not upon the sinner but upon someone else who
was innocent and virtuous. . . . And if a righteous man were
changed into another righteous man—e.g. Paul changed into
Peter and vice versa—then ·each would be rewarded for his
virtue, but· neither would receive his proper reward but
rather the other man’s. This mix-up would not beﬁt the
wisdom of God. ·Confusion for creatures·: If one individual’s
essential nature could change into someone else’s, it would
follow that we creatures had no true being or essence. It
would also follow that

•we couldn’t be certain of anything,
•we couldn’t have true knowledge or understanding of
anything,
•all the innate ideas and precepts of truth that all men
ﬁnd in themselves would be false, and therefore
•anything inferred from those would be false also.

For all certain knowledge depends on what we commonly
call ‘objective truths’—truths about objects—and if ·objects
could change their essences then· objective truths could slide

15

Ancient and Modern Philosophy

Anne Finch, Viscountess Conway

6: Change

around, so that no statement would be invariably true—not
even such clear and obvious truths as that the whole is
greater than its parts and that two halves make a whole.
[The next two sections involve a crucial distinction; Lady Conway is
perfectly clear about it, but she doesn’t highlight it as much as it per-
haps deserves. Before coming to it, let’s be sure of grasping ﬁrmly
what she says about statements of the type ‘x belongs to a different
species from y’, There is difference-of-species understood in the ordinary
informal way: men are one species, horses another, pebbles a third.
Call this loose species-difference. Then there is what we can call tight
species-difference, which occurs when the species that contain x and y
respectively are ‘distinct in their substance or essence’, by which our
author means that those species are fundamentally or basically distinct.
(According to the ‘tight’ criterion, she says, there are only three species:
•·the species whose only member is· God, •·the species whose only
member is· Christ, and •creatures.) By the ‘loose’ criterion there are
countless species of creatures. Now for the crucial distinction, which
occurs within the framework of species ‘loosely’ distinguished from one
another. Let ‘F’ and ‘G’ be two adjectives deﬁning two species—e.g. ‘F’
could be ‘human’ and ‘G’ could be ‘equine’. In Lady Conway’s view, for
any such values of ‘F’ and ‘G’ the statement

(a) Something that is F can change into something that is G,

is true. Thus, a man could in principle become a tree, a tree could
become a rock, etc. On the other hand, for any two individuals x and y
the statement

(b) x can change into y

is false. A man could in principle (a) become a horse, but that man can’t
(b) become that horse.]
3. Can one species can change into another? Before tackling
this question, we should take a close and careful look at
how one species differs from another. Many species are
commonly said to differ from one another though they are
not distinct in •substance or essence but only in •certain
modes [= ‘properties’] or attributes. When these modes or
attributes change, the thing itself is said to have changed
its species; but in such a case what has changed is not the
thing’s essence—is not the thing itself—but only its state
or condition. For example, when some water freezes and

·That is
turns solid, it is still the same portion of stuff.
uncontroversial, but I go further·: When water turns to
stone [see note on page 14], there is no reason to suppose that
a greater change of substance has occurred than when it
turns to ice. And when a stone changes into softer and
more pliant earth, there’s no change of substance here either.
Similarly in all the other changes that we get to observe,
the substance or essence always remains the same: there’s
merely a change of form—the substance gives up one form
and takes on another. These arguments prove that in terms
of its substance or essence one species can’t change from one
into another, and equally that one individual can’t change
into another. A species is simply individual entities brought
under one general and common mental idea or one common
word; for example man is a species containing all individual
men and horse is a species including all individual horses.
Alexander can’t change into another •man—or into his own
•horse!. . . .

4. To learn what changes a thing can undergo, we must
discover how many species of things there are that differ in
their substance or essence. If we look closely into this, we
ﬁnd that there are only three—

God, Christ, creatures

—the three I have already discussed and declared to be
really distinct in their essences. There’s no reason to
think that there is a fourth species essentially distinct from
those three, and anyway there seems to be nothing that
a fourth species could do. All phenomena in the entire
universe can be traced back to the three species I have
mentioned, as though tracing each phenomenon back to
its own particular original cause, nothing pushes us into
recognizing a further species. ·Indeed, something pushes
us the other way, namely· the rule that Entities should not

16

Ancient and Modern Philosophy

Anne Finch, Viscountess Conway

6: Change

be multiplied without need. (·Need we accept that rule? Yes,
because· whatever is handled correctly by the understanding
is utterly true and certain.) The three species that I have
listed cover •all the speciﬁc differences in substances that we
can possibly conceive—•that •vast inﬁnity of possible things,
So how could a place or space be found for a fourth, ﬁfth,
sixth, seventh. . . species? Do these three species really cover
everything? Any entity must be

•altogether unchangeable like God, the supreme being,
•altogether changeable for good or bad, like a crea-
ture. . . . or
•partly changeable in respect to good, like Christ the
son of God and medium between God and creatures.
If there were a fourth, ﬁfth, sixth etc. species, its members
would have to be •not across-the-board unchangeable, •not
across-the-board changeable, and •not partly changeable
and partly unchangeable. What category could we assign
that to? Besides, if you postulate some fourth. . . etc. species
you’ll destroy the excellent order that we ﬁnd in the universe,
since ·on your scheme of things· there would be not only one
medium between God and creatures but two or more—as
many as can be imagined—between the ﬁrst and the last.
Furthermore, just as it agrees with sound reason and with
the order of things that just as

God is one, and doesn’t have two or three or more
distinct substances in himself, and
Christ, being Heaven’s man, i.e. the ﬁrst Adam of
all, is one simple [= ‘partless’] Christ with no distinct
substances in himself,

so likewise

the totality of creatures form single species in sub-
stance or essence, though it includes many individ-
uals gathered into subordinate species and distin-
guished from each other modally but not substantially

or essentially.

Thus, what Paul says about •all human beings, namely that
God ‘has made of one blood all nations of men’ [Acts 17:26],
can be taken to apply to •all creatures. . . . And we can see
why God did this. He made all ‘nations’ of human beings
to be ‘of one blood’ so that they would love one another,
would be united by the same sympathy, and would help one
another. In implanting a certain universal sympathy and
mutual love into his creatures, God made them all members
of one body and all (so to speak) brothers who all have the
same Father, namely •God in Christ, i.e. God made ﬂesh.
They also have one mother, that unique substance or entity
from which all things have come forth, and of which they are
the real parts and members. And although sin has greatly
weakened this love and sympathy in creatures, it hasn’t
altogether destroyed it.
[This version’s ’Father’ and ‘mother’ follow the Latin Pater and mater.
Two remarks about what our author seems to be getting at here. (i) She
is evidently echoing one of the popular ideas about animal generation,
namely that the differentiating push comes from the male seed, while
the female merely provides the soil, as it were, in which the seed grows.
Lady Conway is likening

•‘God creates the universe by giving variety to basic undifferenti-
ated matter’

to

‘A father creates a baby by planting a variety-producing seed in
a woman’s undifferentiated womb’.

Or so it seems; though this doesn’t square with her saying at the start of
chapter 2 that God creates creatures sine omni. . . .materia, i.e. without
(ii) Her reference to ‘that unique sub-
having any material work on.
stance. . . from which all things have come forth’ etc. seems to reﬂect the
somewhat Spinozist view that the whole universe of matter is really just
one single thing. She says this more explicitly on page 35.]
5. ‘It is utterly impossible that anything should change from
being of kind K1 to being of kind K2’—what kinds Kn are
there of which that is true? The three I have mentioned—

17

Ancient and Modern Philosophy

Anne Finch, Viscountess Conway

6: Change

God, Christ, creatures

and only those three. Now that we have accepted this, we
can walk down the middle path of truth about

Being,

leaving the greatest errors and confusion on the right and
left. [This version is following the Latin in the sudden switch from ‘being’
to ‘Being’.] (1) On one side there are those who maintain that
all things are one Being, of which they are real and proper
parts. These ·theorists· mix God with his creatures, implying
that they have a notion of only one essential thing, so that
sin and the devils would be merely •parts of this divine
being or •minor modiﬁcations of it. This has dangerous
consequences. Although I don’t want to pick a quarrel with
those who have fallen into this opinion by mistake, I ought
to warn you about where such principles lead, so that you
may look at them more carefully and avoid their absurdity.
(2) Then there are those maintain that there are two species
of things: •God, the supreme and utterly unchangeable
Being, and •Creatures, the lowest and altogether changeable
beings. These ·theorists· don’t pay enough attention to the
excellent scheme of things that I have described above, which
appears everywhere—·I am referring to the general fact that
the universe doesn’t have qualitative gaps or chasms, so that
between any two different kinds of thing there is an inter-
mediate kind·. Attending to that might have led them to see
that in addition to the two extremes ·of God and creatures·
there is also a certain medium which shares things with
each of them. This is Jesus Christ. The wiser among the
Jews recognize him, and so do some among the ‘Gentiles’,
maintaining that there is such an intermediate Being which
they call by different names such as ‘the Word’, ‘Son of God’,
‘God’s ﬁrst-born Son’, ‘Mind’, ‘Wisdom’, ‘heaven’s Adam’ etc.,
and also ‘the eternal medium’.

If we can get agreement that the case for this:

There is a medium between God and human beings,
indeed between God and all creatures

is just as strong as the case for this:
There is a God and a creation,

this will contribute greatly to spreading the true faith and
Christian religion among Jews and Turks and other inﬁdel
nations. That is because someone who acknowledges that
there is such a medium and believes in him [or ‘in it’; the
Latin doesn’t distinguish these] can be said truly to believe in
Jesus Christ even if they don’t know that that’s what they
believe in and haven’t accepted that he has already come in
the ﬂesh. Once they accept that there is a medium, they’ll
certainly come to accept, perhaps unwillingly, that Christ is
that medium.

Then there are others who put things into very many
essentially different species, multiplying the species of Beings
almost to inﬁnity. This altogether upsets the scheme of
things and clouds the glory of the divine attributes so that it
can’t shine with its proper splendor in creatures. Why? Well,
if a creature were entirely limited by its own individuality,
totally constrained and conﬁned within the very narrow
boundaries of its own species, then no medium could enable
it to change into something else; no creature could attain
further perfection and a greater share in divine goodness,
and creatures couldn’t act and react on each other in various
ways.

6. I’ll illustrate with these things with an example or two.
First, let’s consider a horse that is endowed by its creator
with various levels of perfection, such as

bodily strength and also some kind of grasp of how to
serve its master.
This horse also exhibits

anger, fear, love, memory, and various other qualities.

18

Ancient and Modern Philosophy

Anne Finch, Viscountess Conway

6: Change

We humans have these, and we can also observe them in
dogs and many other animals. Now, God’s power, good-
ness, and wisdom have created this good creature, making
it changeable in such a way that it can continually and
inﬁnitely move towards the good, so that the glory of its
attributes shines more and more. That’s how it is with any
creature: it’s in continual motion—constantly operating—in
ways that tend to bring •improvements (as though they were
its reward for all its work), unless •they are blocked by the
creature’s willfully transgressing ·God’s rules· and misusing
the impartial will that God has given it. A question now
arises:

After a horse has served its master well, doing what
is appropriate for such a creature, what further
perfection—what higher level of goodness of being
or essence—can a horse attain?

Is a horse a mere machine, dead matter? Or does it have
some kind of spirit that has thought, sense, love, and other
properties that are ﬁtting for the spirit of a horse? If it does
have such a spirit (and no-one can doubt that it does), what
happens to this spirit when the horse dies? You may say:

The horse returns to life with the body of another
horse, so that it is still a horse as it was before but
stronger and more beautiful and with a better spirit
than before.

Well, good for it! If it dies a second, third, or fourth time,
becoming steadily better and more excellent, is it still a
horse through all this? And how often can this return-to-life
happen? Is the species horse so inﬁnitely perfect that a
horse can go on improving for ever while still remaining a
horse? It is pretty generally agreed—for good reasons—that
this visible earth won’t always remain in its present state; so
the continual generation of animals in their ·present· coarse
bodies will also have to cease. If the earth takes on another

form in which it doesn’t produce vegetation, then horses
and their like will cease to be as they are now; they can’t
remain the same species, because they won’t have the proper
nourishment for that. It is easy to conclude ‘Well, then, that
will be the end of them!’ but that is wrong. God’s goodness
towards his creatures always remains the same, and his
keeping them in existence is a constant act of creation; so
how can anything be annihilated? I have demonstrated—and
it is generally accepted—that God is a perpetual creator who
acts freely and with •necessity; ·so it isn’t •possible that he
will stop his creative activity by letting any of his creatures
go out of existence·. You might reply:

‘Then if the earth changes in the way you have been
supposing, horses and other animals will correspond-
ingly change in their physical structures, so that they
can still get nourishment from the changed earth.’

Then a new question arises: When the creatures change
in that way, will they still belong to the same species as
before? Or will there come a time ·for a given creature·
when it changes into something different, like the difference
between a horse and a cow, which is usually recognized as
a difference of species. And another: Are there any pairs of
species of creatures S1 and S2 of which the following is true?
S1 is inﬁnitely better than S2, so that a member of
S2 can go on for ever improving and getting closer to
members of S1 without ever coming to belong to S1
itself.

For example, the species horse is in many ways closer to the
species human being than many other creatures are; but is
the qualitative distance between those two species inﬁnite or
only ﬁnite? If it is ﬁnite, then the horse will eventually change
into a human being (in respect to its •spirit, I mean; I am not
asking whether a horse’s •body can become a human body,
because the answer to that is obvious).
If the qualitative

19

Ancient and Modern Philosophy

Anne Finch, Viscountess Conway

6: Change

distance between the two species is inﬁnite, then we have
this result:

Any human being—even one with the lowest and
meanest understanding—has an •actual inﬁnite excel-
lence;

·which shows that we are following a false trail here, because·
that level of actual excellence belongs only to God and
Christ—no creature has it. We do speak of the highest
excellence of creatures using the language of ‘inﬁnity’, but
the inﬁnity we are speaking of is only potential, not actual.
That is, a creature is always able to become more perfect
and more excellent; so its capacity to improve is inﬁnite; but
it never reaches this inﬁnity. For however far a certain ﬁnite
being may progress, it is still always ﬁnite, although there
are no limits to its progress. . . .

I am not contradicting what I said chapter 3 about the
inﬁnity of creatures, because that wasn’t about their inﬁnite
goodness and excellence but only about •how many species
of creatures there are and •how big they are (·i.e. how many
members they have·), neither of which can be counted or
measured by a created intellect. Individual creatures are only
ﬁnitely good, and there is only a ﬁnite qualitative distance
between their species; but they are potentially inﬁnite, i.e.
they are always–endlessly—capable of greater perfection.
Think of an endless staircase with inﬁnitely many steps, no
two of which are inﬁnitely distant from each other (otherwise
it wouldn’t be possible to go up or down the staircase).
Now, the steps in this model represent species that can’t
be inﬁnitely distant from each other or from those that are
closest to them. In fact, daily experience teaches us that
various species change into each other: earth changes into
water [see note on page 14], water into air, air into ﬁre or ether;
and vice versa, ﬁre into air, air into water etc., yet these
are distinct species. Similarly, stones change into metals

and one metal changes into another. You may want to say
‘Those are only bare bodies with no spirit’, ·but don’t say that,
because· we see the same thing happen with plants and even
with animals. Plants: Wheat and barley can and often do
change into each other, especially in Hungary where sowing
barley produces a crop of wheat, and in Germany where
sowing wheat produces a crop of barley. . . . Animals: Worms
change into ﬂies, and when beasts and ﬁsh feed on beasts
and ﬁsh of other species the prey change and come to have
the nature and species of the predators. And doesn’t rotting
matter, i.e. a body composed of earth and water, produce
animals without having contained any seed of those animals?
And when this world was created, didn’t the waters produce
ﬁsh and birds at God’s command? Didn’t the earth also, at
the same command, produce reptiles and beasts, which were
therefore real parts of earth and water? And just as they
got their bodies from the earth, they also got their spirits, or
souls, from the earth. For the earth produced living souls,
as the Hebrew text says, and not simply material bodies
lacking life and spirit. That makes the difference between
human beings and beasts exceedingly striking: we are told
that God made human beings ‘in his image’ and breathed
into them the breath of life that made them living souls, so
that they received his life, the principal part that makes them
human beings, which is really distinct from the divine soul
or spirit that God breathed into them. [In this context and some
others, ‘soul’ translates anima, which is the source of our word ‘animate’.
Where animals are concerned, early modern writers are apt to have no
ﬁrm distinction between having a soul and being alive.]

Moreover, since the human body was made from earth,
which, as has been proved, contained various spirits and
gave those spirits to all the animals [Latin brutis = ‘non-human
animals’], the earth surely gave to human beings the best
spirits that it contained. But all these spirits were far

20

Ancient and Modern Philosophy

Anne Finch, Viscountess Conway

6: Change

inferior to the spirit that human beings received not from
·This· human spirit ought to
the earth but from above.
have dominion over these ·other· merely terrestrial spirits,
enabling it to rule over them and raise them to a higher
level—to raise them indeed to ·the level of· its own nature,
this being the truest ‘multiplication and increase’ of human
beings. But ·sometimes· the human spirit, ·instead of
internalizing earthly spirits and making them like it·, allowed
the internalized earthly spirits to have dominion over it so
that it became like them. That is what lies behind ‘You are of
the earth and you shall return to the earth’ [Ecclesiastes 12:7?],
which has a spiritual as well as a literal meaning.

7. Now we see how God’s justice shines so gloriously in
this transformation of one species into another. ·Don’t be
surprised by my bringing justice into this story·. It is quite
certain that a kind of justice operates not only in •human
beings and •angels but in all other creatures, ·including the
lower animals·. You would have to be blind not to see this!
This justice appears when creatures change for the worse as
much as when they change for the better. When they become
better, this justice bestows a reward and prize for their good
deeds. When they become worse, justice punishes them with
penalties that ﬁt the nature and degree of their wrong-doing.
This justice imposes a law for all creatures and inscribes it in
their very natures. Any creature that observes this ·innately
given· law is rewarded for becoming better. Any creature
that breaks this law is punished accordingly.

·Here are a few examples of this. Beasts in relation to
men:· •Under the law that God gave to the Jews, if a beast
has killed a man, the beast has to be killed. . . . •If any human
being has sexual relations with a beast, not only the man but
the beast must be killed. •It was not only Adam and Eve that
received a sentence and punishment from God after their

transgression but also the serpent, which was the brute part
in man that he had received from the earth. [A ‘brute’ is a lower
animal, a non-human animal (the same as ‘beast’). And ‘brutish’ (and
‘brute’ as an adjective) mean ‘of the same nature as the lower animals’; it
isn’t always automatically a term of condemnation.] ·Men in relation
to beasts:· God implanted in man the same instinct for
justice towards beasts and the trees of the ﬁeld: and man
who is just and good loves the brute creatures that serve him,
and he makes sure that they have food and rest and the other
things they need. He does this not only for his own good but
also in obedience to a principle of true justice. •If he cruelly
requires work from them without providing the food they
need, then he has surely broken the law that God inscribed
in his heart. •If he kills any of his beasts purely for pleasure,
then he acts unjustly and will be punished accordingly. •A
man who has in his orchard a tree that is fruitful and grows
well fertilizes and prunes it so that it becomes better and
better; whereas if the tree is barren and a burden to the
earth, he chops it down and burns it. So there’s a certain
justice in all these things: in the transmutation from one
species to another, whether higher or lower, the same justice
appears. If a man lives a pure and holy life on this earth,
like the heavenly angels, he is elevated to the rank of angels
after he dies and becomes like them. . . .—isn’t that just?
A man who lives such an impious and perverse life that
he is more like a devil raised from hell than like any other
creature, and who dies in that state without repenting, is
hurled down to hell and becomes like the devils—isn’t that
an exercise of the very same justice? But if someone lives a
life that isn’t either angelic or diabolical but rather brutish or
animal, so that his spirit is more like that of beasts than of
any other creature, becoming a brute in spirit and allowing
his brutish part and spirit to have dominion over his better
part, ·after his death· he also changes his bodily shape

21

Ancient and Modern Philosophy

Anne Finch, Viscountess Conway

6: Change

into that of the species of beast that he most resembles in
the qualities and conditions of his mind—doesn’t the same
justice act most justly in this? And since that brute spirit is
now dominant, holding the other spirit—·the one he got from
God·—captive, isn’t it likely that when such a man dies his
brute spirit always governs, suppressing his human spirit
and forcing it to serve the animal spirit in every possible
way? And when that brute spirit returns again into some
other body [apparently the doctrine of reincarnation is at work here],
it rules over •that body and is free to shape •it according
to its own ideas and inclinations (which it didn’t previously
have in the human body).
[In that last parenthetical bit, Lady
Conway is presumably distinguishing a human being’s having a spirit
that is like those of a lower animal from his actually having the thoughts
and desires of such an animal.] It follows that this body that the
vital spirit shapes will be that of a brute and not a human,
because a brute spirit can’t produce anything but a brute
shape. Why not? Because the formative power of such a
spirit is governed by its imagination, which imagines and
conceives as strongly as possible its own image, according
to which the external body must take shape.

8. In this way the justice of God shines forth wonderfully,
since it assigns the appropriate punishment for each kind
and degree of wrongdoing, and doesn’t demand hellﬁre and
damnation for every single wicked sin and transgression.
Christ taught the opposite of that in the parable where he
says that only the third degree of punishment is to be sent
down to hell-ﬁre [Matthew 5: 22]. . . .

What objection can be made to the justice of God? You

might try this:

‘When it is decreed that the body and soul ·of a
particular sinful human being· is converted into the
nature of a brute, this is an insulting lowering of the

dignity and nobility of human nature.’

This can be countered with the common axiom: The cor-
ruption of the best is the worst. When a human being has
so greatly degraded himself by his own willful wrongdoing,
dragging his initially noble nature down to the mental level of
a most foul brute or animal so that it is wholly ruled by lust
and earthly desires, where’s the injustice in God’s making
him bear the same image •in his body as •in the spirit into
which he has internally transformed himself? ·If what you
are mostly indignant about is a person’s being returned to
life with the body of a beast, I reply·: Do you really think it
is worse to have the body of a hog than to have the spirit of
a hog? It certainly isn’t! The lowest level one could possibly
be dragged down to is that of the spirit of a brute; this will
be agreed to by almost everyone who has some genuine
nobility of soul.. . . . However, you might ·complain about
God’s justice from the opposite side·, saying:

‘When someone has lived a brutish life throughout all
his days, it is too mild a punishment merely to bring
him back after death in the condition and state of a
beast.’

I reply to this that the just creator and maker of all things
is wiser than you are, and knows better what punishment
is appropriate for each sin. God has arranged everything as
justly and wisely as possible, so that no-one who lives in a
ﬂesh-dominated way like a beast, can enter the kingdom of
heaven. ·If your complaint about mildness of punishments
is based on the idea that all sin is or should be punished
by hell-ﬁre, I would point out that· Christ explicitly teaches
us that not every sin is to be punished with the penalty of
hell. . . . And ·here’s another relevant consideration·: If a
man is united and joined with something, he becomes one
with that thing. He who unites himself to God is one with
God •in spirit, and he who unites himself to a prostitute

22

Ancient and Modern Philosophy

Anne Finch, Viscountess Conway

6: Change

is one •in ﬂesh with her. Doesn’t it stand to reason that
someone who is united to a beast will become one with that
beast (and similarly in every other case)?. . . . All degrees
and kinds of sin have their appropriate punishments, and
all these punishments tend toward the good of creatures:
under the inﬂuence of mercy and favour, judgment becomes
a judgment in favour of the salvation and restoration of
creatures. Since God’s mercy and favour extends over all his
work, why do we think that God punishes his creatures more
severely and strictly than he does in fact? This dims the glory
of God’s attributes and doesn’t encourage love for God and
admiration for his goodness and justice in the hearts of men
as it should. In fact it does precisely the opposite!
9. The common idea about God’s justice—namely that every
sin is punished by endless hellﬁre—has given men a horrible
idea of God, depicting him as a cruel tyrant rather than a
benign father towards all his creatures. If instead of that an
image of a lovable God were more widely known, ﬁtting what
he is truly like and shows himself to be in all his dealings with
his creatures, and if our souls could inwardly feel him, taste
him, as he is charity and kindness itself and as he reveals
himself through the light and spirit of our Lord Jesus Christ
in the hearts of men, then men would ﬁnally love him above
everything and acknowledge him as the most loving, just,
merciful God, ﬁt to be worshipped before everything, and
incapable of inﬂicting the same punishment on all sinners.
Then—and only then!
10. Then why did he destroy (a) the original world with
water, and decide to destroy (b) this world with ﬁre (as he did
Sodom)? Surely, to show •that he punishes different kinds
of sins differently, and •that while (a) the ﬁrst world was bad,
(b) this one—which is to be destroyed by ﬁre—is even worse
and is therefore to have a greater punishment. ·So much for

how punishments differ in severity·. As for how they differ
in kind: the reason seems to lie in the following contrast. (a)
The old world’s sins were more carnal and brutish, as God’s
word reveals when he said, ‘My spirit will not always strive
in man because he was made ﬂesh’ [Genesis 6:3], meaning
that man’s obedience to the desires of the ﬂesh made him
completely brutish or bestial. The upshot of that was:

If that generation (apart from Noah and his family)
hadn’t been wiped out, the whole human race (with
that same exception) would have been bestial in the
following generations;

and that is what God wanted to avert by drowning them, a
punishment that would bring them back from the nature
of beasts to the nature of men.
In contrast with that, (b)
the sins of this world, which is to destroyed by ﬁre (like
Sodom), are ·not so much brutish as· devilish, because of
their hostility, malice, cruelty, fraud, and cunning. So ﬁre is
the appropriate punishment for those sins, because ﬁre is
the original essence of the devils—those high yet degenerate
spirits—and it is therefore by ﬁre that they [i.e. devilish men]
must be degraded and ·then· restored.

For what is ﬁre, but a certain kind of ethereal and
imperfect substance contained in combustible bodies, which
we see shoot up and immediately vanish because it is so
tenuous? So far as their spirits are concerned, angels as
well as men originate from this ethereal substance, just as
brutes originate from water. [In this sentence, ‘angels’ is meant to
cover also the fallen or degenerate angels whom we call ‘devils’.]

Just as all God’s punishments of his creatures are in
proportion to their sins, they tend to work for the good of the
sinners, curing these sickly creatures and putting them in
a better condition than they were in before; and this is true
even of the worst sinners.

23

Ancient and Modern Philosophy

Anne Finch, Viscountess Conway

6: Change

11. Now, let us consider brieﬂy how creatures are composed,
and how the parts of this composition can change into one
another. ·Can they change into one another? Yes·, because
they originally had the very same essence and being.
[We
are about to encounter two occurrences of ‘principle’ in a sense that it
hasn’t had before in this work.
In early modern times, ‘principle’ and
its French and Latin cognates sometimes mean something like ‘source
(of energy)’ or ‘mechanism (in a very broad sense)’ or ‘drive’. It’s a little
hard to know what word or phrase captures it best in a context where
a ‘principle’ is being described as ‘passive’; but bear in mind that the
‘principles’ referred to here are real parts or aspects of creatures and not
propositions of any kind.] In every visible creature there is (b)
body and (s) spirit, or (s) a more active and (b) a more passive
principle, which are appropriately called male and female
because they are analogous to husband and wife. [Our author
doesn’t mean to align male/female with body/spirit or with spirit/body.
Her point is merely that body and spirit are a co-operating pair. Later
in this section she will imply that anything with both body and spirit is
either male or female, but there’s no hint there that a thing’s sex is de-
termined by the details of its body/spirit mix. On page 27 Lady Conway
starts to indicate a complex but deﬁnite connection between body/spirit
(in that order) and bad/good (in that order); so there can be no question
of her connecting it with the difference between the sexes.] For just
as the normal generation of human beings usually needs
the cooperation of male and female, so too every generation
and production of anything at all requires the simultaneous
operation of those two principles, spirit and body. ·Here is
how this co-operation works·. •Spirit is light, i.e. the eye
looking at its very own image; and •the body is the darkness
that receives this image. When the spirit sees it, that’s like
seeing oneself in a mirror. The spirit can’t see itself reﬂected
like that in clear air or in any diaphanous [= ‘nearly transparent’]
body, because the reﬂection of an image requires a certain
opacity, which we call ‘body’. But nothing is essentially

a body, just as nothing is essentially dark—nothing is so
Indeed, darkness itself
dark that it can’t become bright.
can become light, just as created light (·as distinct from the
uncreated light of God·) can be turned into darkness, as the
words of Christ plainly show when he says ‘Take heed that
the light which is in you be not darkness’ [Luke 11:35]. By
‘the light that it is in you’ he means the eye—the spirit—that
is in the body and that sees the images of things. As well
as needing a body to •receive and reﬂect its image, every
spirit also needs a body to •retain the image. Every body has
some degree of this retentive nature; the more perfect a body
is—i.e. the more thoroughly mixed it is—the more retentive it
is. Thus water retains more than air does, and earth retains
certain things more than water does. The seed [Latin semen]
of a female creature is the purest extract of the whole body,
which means that it is perfectly mixed, and therefore has a
remarkable power of retention. The masculine semen, which
is the spirit and image of the male, is received and retained
in this ·feminine· seed,. . . . along with other spirits that are
in the woman. Whichever spirit is strongest and has the
strongest image in the woman, whether it’s the man’s or
the woman’s or some other spirit that has come ·into the
woman· from outside them both, that will be the spirit that
predominates in the seed and forms a body as similar as
possible to its image. That is how every creature gets its
bodily shape.

The internal productions of the mind are generated in
(I am talking about the mind’s thoughts.
the same way.
·Some philosophers have said that thoughts are not mental
substances but merely states of or events in minds, which
are substances; but I contend that· thoughts are genuine
creatures, each of its own kind, and that they have a true
substance appropriate to themselves.) These thoughts are
our inner children, and they divide into masculine and

24

Ancient and Modern Philosophy

Anne Finch, Viscountess Conway

6: Change

feminine—i.e. they have body and spirit.
If our thoughts
didn’t have body, we couldn’t retain them or reﬂect on
them. Why not? Because all reﬂection depends on a certain
darkness, and that’s the body. Similarly, memory requires a
body in order to retain the spirit of the thought; otherwise
it vanishes, as a mirror-image vanishes when the object
is removed. Thus, when we remember something, we see
within ourselves its image, which is the spirit that came from
it when we looked at it from the outside. This image, this
spirit, is retained in some body which is the seed of our brain,
and that is how a certain spiritual generation—·as it were a
spiritual giving-birth·—occurs in us. Thus, every spirit has
its own body and every body has its own spirit. Just as a
body, whether of man or brute, is nothing but a countless
multitude of bodies gathered into one and arranged in a
certain structure, so the spirit of man or brute is also a
countless multitude of spirits united in this body; they are
rank-ordered in such a way that one is the principal ruler,
another has second place, a third commands others below
itself, and so on down—just as in an army. That is why
creatures are called ‘armies’ and God is called ‘the leader’
of these armies. Just as the devil who assaulted the man
·whom Jesus helped· said ‘My name is legion, because we

are many’ [Mark 5:9]. So every human being, indeed every
creature, contains many spirits and bodies. (The Jews call
men’s many spirits ‘Nizzuzuth’, meaning ‘sparks’. [A footnote
here refers to texts in the Kabbalah.]) Indeed, every body is a spirit
and nothing else, differing from a spirit only by being darker;
so the more lumpy and coarse it becomes, the further it
gets from condition of spirit. The distinction between spirit
and body is only modal and incremental, not essential and
substantial.
[That last brief sentence should be lingered on a little. For Descartes the
mind/body or spirit/body distinction is

essential: nothing could possibly move from one side of the line
to the other;

and it is

substantial:
stance and another.

it is a difference between one basic kind of sub-

Those may be merely two ways of saying the same thing. Against them
(or it), Lady Conway says that the spirit/body distinction is

modal: it’s a distinction between two ‘modes’ that a substance
might have, i.e. two states or conditions it might be in;

and it is

incremental: it marks a difference of degree, so that (for example)
a given substance might be more spiritual than it used to be.

Our author’s departure from Descartes (and many others) on this topic
is sharp and radical. Now we shall see what she does with it.]

25

Ancient and Modern Philosophy

Anne Finch, Viscountess Conway

7: Body and spirit: arguments 1–3

Chapter 7: Body and spirit: arguments 1–3

My thesis about body and spirit implies that •the nature of
every body is that of a life or spirit, which has the power of
perception and is also capable of sense and thought, love
and desire, joy and grief. . . .; and consequently that • every
body can act and move on its own initiative, putting itself
wherever it wants to be. I want to explain more clearly what
my case is for all this.
1. My ﬁrst reason [the second begins on page 28] comes from the
three-part classiﬁcation of things that I have presented:

God, the highest,
Christ, the intermediate being, and
the creation, the lowest rank.

So far as its nature or essence is concerned, this ‘creation’ is
one entity, one substance, as I have shown; so that it varies
only in its modes of existence, one of which is corporeality.
[That was a statement about variation at a time as well as through time.
The variety in the created world right now comes from such facts as that
your body exists and so does your mind; but that’s not a fact about
two different things, two substances, but only about different features
that the one substance has in different parts of itself—it has corporeality
here and spirituality there, or in plainer language it is bodyish here and
mindish there.] The body/spirit difference is a matter of degree:
a thing can be pretty close to being a body or quite a long
way from being a spirit. And because spirit is the more
excellent of the two in the true and natural order of things,
the more spiritual a creature is the closer it is to God unless it
degenerates in some other way; because God, as we all know,
is the highest spirit. So a body can become more and more
spiritual, without end, because God, the ﬁrst and highest
spirit, is inﬁnite and can’t have any corporeality in his
constitution. It is indeed in the nature of a creature (unless

it degenerates) to become ever more like the creator. But no
creature can become more and more corporeal without end,
in the way it can become more and more a spirit. Why the
difference? Because nothing is

•in every way contrary to God;
•inﬁnitely and unchangeably bad, as God is inﬁnitely
and unchangeably good;
•inﬁnitely dark as God is inﬁnitely light;
•inﬁnitely a body with no spirit, as God is inﬁnitely
spirit with no body.

So nothing can become darker and darker to inﬁnity, al-
though it can become brighter and brighter to inﬁnity; and
nothing can go from bad to worse to inﬁnity, although
anything can become better and better to inﬁnity. Thus,
in the very nature of things there are limits to evil, but none
to goodness. And every degree of evil or sin has its own
punishment,. . . . which is appropriate to the nature of the
case, and this punishment turns the evil back towards good.
Each sin has its punishment stored within it for future use
(though the sinner doesn’t realize it while the sin is going
on); and when the right time comes for this, the punishment
will be unleashed and the sinner will feel the pain of it. This
will return him to the original state of goodness in which he
was created and from which he can’t ever fall again because
this great punishment has made him stronger and more
perfect, so that he rises from •his previous indifference of
will regarding good and evil to •a level at which he wants
only to be good and is incapable of wishing any evil. [The
move from ‘it’ to ‘he’ in this paragraph is based on a general sense of
appropriateness. The distinction doesn’t exist in Latin.]

26

Ancient and Modern Philosophy

Anne Finch, Viscountess Conway

7: Body and spirit: arguments 1–3

From this we can infer that all God’s creatures that have
fallen, i.e. come down from their initial goodness, must in due
course be raised again to a condition that is actually better
than that in which they were created. God is incessantly
at work, so it’s the nature of every creature to be always
in motion and always changing from good to good, from
good to evil, or from evil back to good.
It isn’t possible
to move for ever towards evil (because there’s no such
thing as inﬁnite evil); so it is inevitable that every creature
will ·at some time· turn again towards good, because the
only alternative is to stop changing altogether, and that is
contrary to nature. You might want to suggest that ·there
is another alternative, namely that· the sinful creature falls
into eternal torment. I reply: If by ‘eternal’ you mean ’lasting
through an endless inﬁnity of ages’, what you are suggesting
is impossible because all pain and torment stimulates the
life, the spirit, of the sufferer. We have plenty of experience
of the truth of this, and it also stands to reason: pain and
suffering reduce whatever thickness or lumpiness [grossities
vel crassitudo] the spirit or body is afﬂicted by; so the spirit
that was •imprisoned in such thickness or lumpiness is
set •free and becomes more spiritual and therefore more
active and effective, this being achieved by pain. [Lady Conway
suffered considerable and sometimes acute pain—headaches—through
most of her waking hours throughout most of her adult life.]

So there we have it: a creature can’t •proceed for ever
toward evil or •fall into inactivity or •spend an eternity in
suffering; from which it irrefutably follows that the creature
must return toward the good, and the greater its suffering
the sooner it will make that return. We see, then, how
something, while continuing to be the same •substance, can
wonderfully change its •state, so that a holy and blessed
spirit or an angel of light may become an evil and cursed
spirit of darkness through its own willful actions. This

change or metamorphosis [here = ‘very radical change’] is as great
as what happens when a spirit becomes a body. Does such a
spirit become more corporeal than it was originally, before its
wrongdoing pulled it down? Yes it does; and I have already
shown that a spirit can become more or less corporeal—it’s
a matter of degree—though it can’t move in that direction to
inﬁnity. Spirits can remain for long periods of time without
any of the bodily lumpiness characteristic of visible things in
this world, such as rocks or metals or the bodies of men and
women. For surely even the worst spirits have bodies that
are less lumpy than a visible body is. Yet all that lumpiness
of visible bodies comes from spirits’ having fallen from their
original state. Because of this thickness, spirits can in time
(how much time varies) shrink and pull into themselves. This
can’t happen all at once in a general way so that the entire
body of a fallen spirit becomes equally lumpy in all its parts.
Rather, some parts become ever thicker while other corporeal
parts of this spirit retain a certain tenuousness, ·a certain
thinness or ﬂuid quality·; if they didn’t, the spirit couldn’t be
as active or mobile as it is. These more tenuous parts of a
corporeal spirit are (1) its immediate vehiculum, with which
(2) it is intimately united.

[(1) Lady Conway has been invoking the view—popularized by Descartes
but not invented by him—that a living body contains ‘animal spirits’,
which are extremely ﬁne or ﬂuid portions of matter that can move fast,
get in anywhere, and do the sort of work that we today assign to the
nervous system. She (or rather her Latin translator) uses vehiculum in
the sense of ‘subordinate ofﬁcial’ or ‘executive ofﬁcer’; and the tenuous
parts of this spirit are its ‘immediate’ vehiculum in contrast with other
more lumpy parts of the body on which the spirit acts indirectly, mediat-
edly, through these tenuous animal spirits. (2) Our author is also echoing
what was then a fairly common view about the close •connection between
your body and your mind, namely that •it depends your mind’s acting
on the most mind-like or ‘tenuous’ parts of your body. Descartes held
that minds act directly on animal spirits, but not because the latter are
mind-like; for him, nothing corporeal is in any way mind-like. The part

27

Ancient and Modern Philosophy

Anne Finch, Viscountess Conway

7: Body and spirit: arguments 1–3

that he rejected was accepted by some, and appears memorably here:

. . . blood labours to beget
Spirits as like souls as it can,
Because such ﬁngers need to knit
The subtle knot that makes us man. . . .
That is from John Donne’s poem ‘The Extasie’.]

The principal spirit (together with as many of its subordinate
spirits as it can gather together along with those more ﬁnely
divided and tenuous parts of the body) pulls away from the
lumpier parts of the body, abandoning them as though they
were so many dead corpses that have lost the ability to serve
those same spirits in their operations.

This departure of subtler and stronger spirits from the
thicker and harder parts ·of the body· into ·the vicinity of·
better and more tenuous ones can be seen in the behaviour
of alcohol that freezes when subjected to extreme cold. If the
parts of a body near the surface are frozen by the external
cold, and the stronger spirits have avoided that by moving
in towards the centre of the body, where the matter is more
tenuous and where everything is warmer, then any single
drop of alcohol that escapes freezing by moving in to the
warm centre has more—many times more—strength and
vigour than all the parts that are frozen. ·Moving on now
from that to a different point:· We must recognize that thick
lumpy bodies are of two kinds: bodies of one kind can be
seen and felt by touch; those of the other kind are invisible
and impalpable [unfeelable], and yet they are just as thick as
the others—indeed often thicker and harder. Though they
don’t affect our outer senses, we can perceive them internally
by our inner senses. . . . They are extremely hard, harder in
fact than any ﬂint or metal that our hands can hold. Visible
water is composed of these small, hard bodies. It appears
to us quite soft, ﬂuid, and tenuous, but that is because of
the many other subtle bodies that continually stir and move

the hard particles, so that ·a portion of· water appears to
our crude senses as one simple and homogeneous thing.
Actually, it consists of many heterogeneous and dissimilar
parts, more so than most other bodies. Many of these parts
are quite hard and pebble-like: they are the source of beach
sand and other sorts of gravel and stones that come from
the water in the depths of the earth. When these little pebbly
particles of water grow into visible gravel and stones, they
eventually lose their hardness and become softer and more
tenuous than they had been when they were part of the
water. Stones decay and turn into soft earth, from which
animals come. Indeed, decaying stones often change right
back into water; but this is a different sort of water from
before, because one of them hardens while the other softens.
You can see this in the two kinds of water that ﬂow from
one mountain in Switzerland: drinking one •produces kidney
stones, drinking the other •dissolves them. . . . That’s why
it is right to say that the heart or spirit of a wicked man is
‘hard’ or ‘stony’: his spirit does have real hardness in it, like
that found in those pebbly little particles of water. And why
it is right to say that the spirit of a good person is ‘soft’ and
‘tender’. We can really feel the inner hardness and softness of
spirit, and any good person perceives this ·inwardly, but· as
tangibly as he can feel the outer hardness of lumpy external
bodies with his hands. People who are dead in their sins
have no feeling for the hardness or softness of good or bad
spirits; so they think that ‘softness of spirit’, ‘hardness of
heart’ and so on are mere metaphors, when really they have
a literal meaning with nothing metaphorical about it.

2. My second reason for holding that created spirits can
change into bodies and bodies into spirits is based on a
properly serious consideration of God’s attributes; the truth
of everything can be declared by them, as though they were

28

Ancient and Modern Philosophy

Anne Finch, Viscountess Conway

7: Body and spirit: arguments 1–3

a treasury of learning. [The ﬁrst reason began on page 26; the third
will start on page 30.] God is inﬁnitely good and communicates
his goodness to all his creatures in inﬁnite ways; so every
one of his creatures receives something of his goodness, and
receives it in with the utmost fullness. And his goodness is a
living goodness, containing life, knowledge, love, and power
that he communicates to his creatures. So how could he
be the source or creator of anything dead? For example, of
any mere body or matter, understood according to the views
of those who claim that matter can’t be changed into any
degree of life or perception? It has been truly said that God
didn’t create •death. It is equally true that he doesn’t create
•anything that is dead, for how could a dead thing come from
him who is inﬁnite life and love? How could a being who is as
inﬁnitely generous and good as God is give any creature an
essence that is so low-down and diminished that it has no
part in life or perception and has no hope of the least degree
of these for all eternity? What was God’s purpose in creating
anything? Wasn’t it so that his creatures could be blessed in
him and enjoy his divine goodness in their various conditions
and states? How could such enjoyment be possible without
life or perception? How can divine goodness be enjoyed by
something that is dead?

I will now carry this argument further. It is customary
and correct to divide God’s attributes into those that can’t
be communicated [= ‘shared with anything else’]:

God’s subsisting by himself, and his being indepen-
dent, unchangeable, absolutely inﬁnite, and most
perfect;

and those that can:

God’s having spirit, light, life, his being good, holy,
just, wise, and so on.

Every one of these communicable attributes is alive—is
indeed life. Now, every creature shares certain attributes

with God; so which of his attributes is it that produces dead
matter, body, that is for ever incapable of life and sense. You
may say:

A portion of dead matter shares with God having
reality or having an essence.

I reply: There can’t be any dead reality in God for the
creature to share in; so it will have to have its own dead
reality! Besides, reality is not properly speaking attributed
to something; but what is properly attributed to something
is what is predicated or afﬁrmed about that reality. So
there are no attributes or perfections that can be attributed
to dead matter and analogously to God. . . .
[Our author’s
saying ‘attributes or perfections’ highlights the connection between this
passage and the debate over whether existence is a ‘perfection’ of God, as
Descartes said it is. Gassendi replied that ‘existence isn’t a perfection; it
is that in the absence of which there are no perfections’; Lady Conway’s
view is not dissimilar.]

Also, God’s creatures, just because they are creatures,
must be like their creator in certain things. Well, in what
way is this dead matter like God? If you say ‘They are alike in
having sheer reality,’ I reply that there can’t be anything like
that either in God or in creatures—so it is mere unreality.

As for the remaining attributes of matter—impenetrability,
shape, and motion—obviously God doesn’t have these, so
they aren’t among his communicable attributes! Then what
are they? They fall within the scope of an attribute of
creatures that they don’t share with God, namely changeabil-
ity; because impenetrability etc. are simply respects in which
creatures can change. Thus, since dead matter doesn’t share
any of God’s communicable attributes, we have to conclude
that dead matter is completely unreal—an empty ﬁction, an
illusion, an impossible thing. You might try:

‘Every being is true and good, so dead matter has
metaphysical truth and goodness.’

29

Ancient and Modern Philosophy

Anne Finch, Viscountess Conway

7: Body and spirit: arguments 1–3

Well, what is this ‘truth and goodness’? If it has no overlap
with any of God’s communicable attributes, then it isn’t true,
isn’t good, isn’t anything! And there’s a related point: Since
we can’t say how •dead matter shares anything with God’s
goodness, we are even further—much further—from being
able to show how •it can reason and can grow in goodness to
inﬁnity; and I have shown that it is the nature of all creatures
to do that. ·If you aren’t convinced of that, consider·: What
progress in goodness and perfection can dead matter make?
After a portion of matter has gone through inﬁnite changes
of motion and shape, it is still compelled to be as dead as
ever. And if motion and shape contribute nothing to life,
this matter can never improve or progress in goodness in
the smallest degree. Here is another attempt to escape my
conclusion:

This dead matter, this body, might go through all
the shapes and physical conﬁgurations there are,
including ones that are utterly regular and precise
[here = ‘ones in which this body is a complex beautifully
functioning machine’].

But what good is that to the body when is still lacks all life
and perception? Well, then, we could suppose this:

A portion of matter has gone through an inﬁnity of
motions from the slowest to the fastest, a process in
which it becomes better because of a certain inner
power to improve itself.

But a body could have such an intrinsic power only if its
nature required it and brought it about; and the nature of
a sheerly dead body doesn’t ‘require’ any kind of motion or
shape, and doesn’t ‘improve’ itself by selecting one motion or
shape rather than another. . . .

3. My third argument is drawn from the great love and
desire that each spirit or soul has for bodies, and especially

for the body that it inhabits and is united with. [The second
reason began on page 28; the fourth will begin on page 38.] When one
thing is brought towards another by love or desire, that is
because

(1) they are of one nature and substance, or
(2) they are like each other or are of one mind, or
(3) one owes its existence to the other.

We ﬁnd examples of this among all animals that produce
their own offspring in way that human beings do, in which
a parent (3) loves what it has given birth to. Thus even
wicked men and women (except for the extremely perverse
and proﬂigate) love their own children and cherish them with
natural affection. That’s because their children are (1) of
one nature and substance with them, as though they were
parts of them. And if their children (2) resemble them in
body, spirit, or behaviour, that increases the parents’ love
still further. We also see that animals of the same species
love each other more than animals of a different species:
farm-animals of one species graze together, birds of one
species ﬂy in ﬂocks, ﬁsh of one species swim together, and
men prefer the company of men to that of other creatures.
And in addition to this •particular love there is also a certain
•universal love that all creatures have for each other, despite
the great confusion [here = ‘the great moral mess’] that resulted
from the Fall. This is a natural and inevitable upshot of
the same basic fact that all things have a basic substance
or essence that makes them one—like organs or limbs of a
single body. Also, we see in every species of animal that
males and females love each other and that in all their
matings (except ones that are abnormal and against nature)
they care for each other. This comes not only from (1) their
unity of nature but also from (2) their conspicuous similarity
to each other. These two foundations for the love between
men and women are explicitly mentioned in Genesis. (1) The

30

Ancient and Modern Philosophy

Anne Finch, Viscountess Conway

7: Body and spirit: arguments 1–3

unity of their nature comes in when Adam says of his wife:
‘She is bone of my bone, ﬂesh of my ﬂesh, etc.’ (Genesis 2:23).
She loved him because she was taken from him and was part
of him. (2) Their similarity comes in here: no helpmeet was
found for him until Eve was made; among all creatures he
saw no one ‘like himself’ with whom he could associate until
Eve was created for him. A third reason for love is at work
when (3) two beings who are not one substance nevertheless
love each other because one of them has brought the other
into existence and is its genuine and real cause. That is
how things stand with regard to God and his creatures.
He gave existence, life, and motion to everything, so he
loves everything and can’t not love everything. When he
seems to be angrily hostile to them, this anger and the
punishment and judgment that come from it are for the
creatures’ good, providing them with what God sees that
they need. And in the other direction, God is loved by every
creature that isn’t altogether degenerate and lost to all sense
of God. . . . The creatures that most resemble God love him
more and are more loved by him. [Our author says that one
might maintain that the principal cause of love is goodness:
creatures love God because he is so good, and love one
another because they (rightly or wrongly) see one another as
good. She responds that] goodness is the greatest cause of
love and its proper object, but goodness isn’t a fourth reason
for love, •additional to the ﬁrst three, because it is •included
in them. Why do we call something ‘good’? Because it
pleases us on account of its real or apparent similarity to
us. [The Latin attaches ‘real or apparent’ to the pleasing rather than to
the similarity. That seems to be a slip.] This is why good people
love good people and not others. For good people can’t love
bad people, and bad people can’t love good ones. . . . [She
adds that one thing’s bringing another thing into existence
generates love between them because it generates similarity

between them]

Taking this as a touchstone, let us now return to our
subject–·the unifying thread through this chapter·—namely
the question of whether spirit and body are of one nature
and substance and therefore able to change into each other.
Tell me what the explanation is of the following well-known
fact:

The human soul or spirit loves the body so much,
unites with it so tightly, and parts company from it
so unwillingly, that in some cases a person’s soul
remains •with his body and •subject to it after the
body has died, decomposed, and turned to dust.

[Continuing with the 1-2-3 numbering on page 30:] The reason for
this love can’t be that (3) the spirit or soul gave the body
its separate existence, or that the body did this for the
spirit; because that would be—speaking strictly and literally—
creation; and that is solely the function of God and Christ.
Therefore, the love I have asked about must occur because of
(2) the similarity or afﬁnity between the natures of the soul
and the body. [Lady Conway reverts to the explanation of love
in terms of goodness, deals with it as she did a paragraph
back, and then adds something:] What is that ‘goodness’
in the body that makes the soul love it so much? What
are the attributes or perfections in respect of which a body
resembles a spirit, if the body is nothing but a dead torso,
a mass of matter that is quite incapable of any degree of
life or perfection? You may say: ‘A body agrees with a soul
or spirit in respect of being or reality: just as the spirit has
being, so does the body.’ I have already refuted this, ·but
will give the refutation again, ﬁlling in its details a little·. If
this being—·this supposed being, this lump of permanently
dead matter·—has no attributes or perfections matching
those of a spirit, then it’s a mere ﬁction. God hasn’t created
any bare being, i.e. something that is only mere being, with

31

Ancient and Modern Philosophy

Anne Finch, Viscountess Conway

7: Body and spirit: arguments 1–3

no attributes that can be predicated of it. Being is merely
a logical term and concept, which logicians call the most
general genus. As a bare and abstract notion, it doesn’t exist
•in things themselves but only •as a concept, only •in the
human mind. For this reason, every being has an individual
nature with certain ascertainable attributes. What attributes
does a body have that are similar to those of a spirit? Let
us look into the principal attributes of the body that make it
different from the spirit according to the view of those who
hold that body and spirit are so utterly distant in nature that
neither cannot become the other. There are two of these.

(a) Every body is impenetrable by all other bodies: the
parts of different bodies cannot penetrate each other.

(b) Every body is divisible.

In contrast with this, the people whose views I am examining
hold that

(a’) spirits are penetrable: one spirit can penetrate
another; a thousand spirits can exist within each
other, taking up no more space than one spirit.

(b’) spirits are so simple and uniﬁed that no spirit can be

separated, dismantled into really distinct parts.

Now, I have said that similarity is the true basis of love and
unity; but if we compare the above attributes of body and
spirit we see that far from having any similarity or natural
afﬁnity to each other they are ﬂat-out opposites. In the minds
of these people, it is inconceivable that anything ·else· in the
entire universe is as contrary as are body and spirit. Black
and white? hot and cold? No, because black can become
white and hot can become cold, whereas (they say) something
that is (a) impenetrable can’t become (a’) penetrable. Not even
God and creatures are as utterly different in their essence as
body and spirit are (according to these people): God shares
many of his attributes with creatures, but we can’t ﬁnd any
attribute of body that in any way matches ·an attribute of·

spirit or (therefore) of God, who is the highest and purest
spirit. So body couldn’t be created by God, and must be
merely non-being or a ﬁction. Moreover, just as body differs
from spirit in respect of (im)penetrability, they also differ in
respect of (in)divisibility. [In this passage, Lady Conway has been
expressing the views of the philosophers she is attacking, not her own
views; except for the sentence ‘So body couldn’t be. . . or a ﬁction’, which
seems to be her sarcastic remark that body, on her opponents’ view about
it, couldn’t be created by God.]

Here is a reply that might be made to that:

Body and spirit do share certain attributes, such as
extension, motion, and shape. A spirit can stretch
from one place to another, can move from place to
place, and can change itself into any shape it pleases.
In response to this I say, as I did earlier [on page 6], that a
spirit can have extent (though that is denied by most of those
who claim that body and soul are essentially different). But
there’s a terriﬁc difference between the extension of spirit
and the extension of body as those folk understand it. In the
case of body,. . . .extension and impenetrability are really only
a single attribute conceptualized in two different ways. If a
body x doesn’t impenetrably keep other bodies out of a given
region, what content is there to the statement that x is in that
region? Furthermore, according to the thinking of the people
I am criticising, the extension of body is utterly different
from that of spirit: a body’s extension is so necessary and
essential to it that it couldn’t possibly have been more or
less extended than it is; whereas a spirit (according to these
people) can be extended more or less. And since the ability to
move and to have a shape stand or fall with extension, what
I have said about extension holds equally for those other two
attributes. ·And there is a more direct reason for holding
that· spirit has shape and mobility in a very different way
from body, ·namely that· a spirit can move and shape itself,

32

Ancient and Modern Philosophy

Anne Finch, Viscountess Conway

7: Body and spirit: arguments 1–3

which a body cannot do.

4.
·IMPENETRABILITY·
Anyway, what’s going on when they declare that impenetra-
bility is an essential attribute of the body and penetrability
an essential attribute of spirit? Why can’t a body be more or
less impenetrable and spirit more or less penetrable?" That’s
how it is with other attributes: a body can be more or less
heavy or light, dense or rare, solid or liquid, hot or cold; so
why can’t it also be more or less impenetrable? They may
say:

We always see that a body, when it goes through these
·other· changes, remains impenetrable. For example,
when iron is red-hot it is still impenetrable.

I agree that the red-hot iron is not penetrable by any other
equally coarse body; but it can be and is penetrated by a
more ﬁnely divided body, namely the ﬁre that enters it and
penetrates all its parts. This softens it, and if the ﬁre is
strong it completely liqueﬁes the iron. They might respond:
This incursion of ﬁre into the iron isn’t ‘penetration’
in the philosophical sense, i.e. it doesn’t enter it in
such a way that ﬁre and iron occupy only one place
and are consequently most •intimately present one
to the other. The supposition that it does is ﬂatly
contradicted by the facts: red-hot iron swells and
takes on greater mass than when cold, and when
cooled it becomes hard again and returns to its former
size.

To this I reply that if they are using ‘penetration’ to mean
what we call •‘intimate presence’ (in which a homogeneous
substance enters into another of equal size, without increas-
ing its size or weight), this appears altogether irrational. It is
utterly impossible—it would be downright contradictory—for

any creature to have the power of such intimate presence.
Only God and Christ, as creators, have the privilege of
being intimately present to creatures. If a creature could be
intimately present to another creature, it would stop being a
creature because it would now have one of the incommuni-
cable attributes of God and Christ. (This attribute should be
ascribed primarily to God, and secondly to Christ because he
is the intermediate being between God and creatures. ·Christ
comes into this on the strength of his intermediate position·.
Just as he is involved in changeability and unchangeability,
and in eternity and time, he can be said to be involved
in spirit and body and thus in place and extension. His
body is a different ·kind of· substance from the bodies of
all other creatures; ·so there is no absurdity in supposing
that· he is intimately present to creatures. But he isn’t to be
confounded with them!) To suppose that one creature can be
intimately present to another, mingling or uniting with it in a
most perfect way without increasing its weight or extension,
smudges the distinctions amongst creatures and makes two
or more of them into one. Indeed, this hypothesis implies
that the whole creation could be reduced to a tiny particle
of dust, because any part could penetrate any other without
increasing its size. My opponents may reply:

That only proves that •spirits can be reduced to
a tiny space, but not •bodies, because they are
impenetrable,

to which I respond that they are begging the question,
because they haven’t yet proved that body and spirit are
different substances. If they aren’t different, neither of them
is any more penetrable than the other (according to the views
of the people I am attacking). ·If you question whether an
item could be (1) unable to be intimately present to any
other of the same kind and yet (2) able to be intimately
present to something of some other kind, consider the case

33

Ancient and Modern Philosophy

Anne Finch, Viscountess Conway

7: Body and spirit: arguments 1–3

of time·.
It’s easy to see that time is extended in such a
way that. . . .no part of it can be intimately present in any
other part. The ﬁrst day of the week can’t be present in the
second, or the ﬁrst hour of the day in the second, or the ﬁrst
minute of the hour in the second minute of the same hour.
That’s because it is the nature and essence of time to be
successive, one part coming after another. Yet God is really
and intimately present in all times, and doesn’t change. Not
so for creatures, however, because they continually change
as times change; for time is nothing but the motion or change
of creatures from one condition or state to another. Just as
this is how things stand with regard to time and creatures
in time, it’s the same for mass or quantity. Whereas in
God there is no time and no mass or corporeal quantity,
in creatures there is both; if there weren’t, the creatures
would be—impossibly—either God or nothing. And the kind
of quantity, mass and extension that any creature has it
has essentially; just as it’s of the essence of time that it
consists of many parts, which have parts, which. . . and so
on to inﬁnity. We have no trouble grasping how a shorter
time is nested within a longer one—60 minutes in an hour,
24 hours in a day—although one hour immediately borders
upon the next and cannot be present in it. That’s how it is
with creatures in respect of ·their spatial extent, i.e.· their
mass and size: one creature can touch another but can’t be
present in all its parts.

But a smaller body can be in a larger one, and a more
ﬁnely divided body can be in a body whose separate parts are
larger. This last is the kind of penetration that bodies can
properly be said to engage in: a body can be penetrated by
another body that is more ﬁnely divided than it is, but not by
one that is equally or less ﬁnely divided. Similarly with souls,
which have bodies and can therefore be distinguished into
more and less ﬁnely divided. Actually, the difference between

•more and less ﬁnely divided is the difference between body
and spirit. (In saying this I turn my back on the thesis that
body is merely a dead thing, lacking life and the capacity for
life, in favour of the view that body is an excellent creature
of God that has—actually or potentially—life and sensation.)
That goes with the fact that the word ‘spirit’ comes from air,
which has the most ﬁnely divided nature in the visible world.
Spirit is better deﬁned in this passage from the Kabbala
Denudata [a contemporary anthology of Kabbalist writings—see the
note on page 3]:

A ‘spirit’ is deﬁned as a central nature that has the
ability to emit a luminous sphere and to control
its size (which seems to be what Aristotle meant by
‘entelechy’).

And later in the same work:

‘Matter’ is deﬁned as a pure centre or a point without
a radius. . . . From this we must conclude that the
impenetrability of creatures must be limited to their
centres.

The Hebrew word ruach, which means ‘spirit’, also signiﬁes
air. It’s because air moves so fast that in any moving body
all the swiftness of its motion is attributed to its spirit.
When common people see no motion in bodies, they in their
ignorance call them ‘dead’, and say they have ‘no spirit or
life’. But in fact there’s no such thing as a dead body; every
body has motion, and consequently life or spirit. So every
creature—spirit as well as body—has its own appropriate
weight or extension, which cannot be made larger or smaller.
This doesn’t prevent us from seeing how a tiny body can
expand to a thousand times its former size, as happens with
the amazing expansion of gunpowder. All this expansion
comes from body’s being divided into smaller and smaller
parts; they don’t truly ﬁll the whole of that larger space,
because the sum of the size of these tiny parts exactly

34

Ancient and Modern Philosophy

Anne Finch, Viscountess Conway

7: Body and spirit: arguments 1–3

equals the size of the original nub of gunpowder. We have
to conclude from this that whenever a created spirit is in a
body, either •it occupies pores (or tunnels like those a mole
makes) or •it makes the body swell to a larger size ·in the
way I have described for gunpowder·, as when ﬁre enters into
iron and makes it swell. This swelling can and sometimes
does occur on such a small scale that we can’t see it; it
could even happen on such a small scale that it couldn’t be
expressed in numbers. . . .
·DIVISIBILITY·
Now let us turn to the second attribute that is said to be
had by bodies but not by spirits, namely divisibility. If they—
·the people I am opposing·—are saying that every body is
divisible, so that even the smallest conceivable (if such a body
can be conceived) can be divided, this is plainly impossible, a
contradiction in terms, implying that the •smallest creature
can be divided into •smaller parts. Thus, if ‘a body’ is taken
to refer to one single individual, then every body is indivisible.
When we speak of bodies as ‘divisible’, we usually mean that
we can separate one body from another by placing a third
body between them, and in this sense spirits are as divisible
as bodies! A single spirit can’t become two or more spirits
(·any more than a single body can become two bodies·), but
several spirits coexisting in one body can be separated from
each other as easily as bodies can. However bodies or spirits
may be divided or separated from each other throughout
the universe, they always remain united in this separation,
because the whole creation is always just one substance or
entity, with no vacuum in it. . . . Quite generally, creatures
are united with one another so that no one of them can be
separated from its fellow creatures. There’s also a particular
and much more special unity among the parts of one species
in particular. [The reference is to homo sapiens, or perhaps to animals
generally.] When a body is divided and its limbs are separated

by a certain distance, as long as the limbs don’t decompose
and change to another species they always send out tiny
particles to each other and to the body that the limbs came
from; and that body emits similar particles (which can be
called ‘spirits and bodies’ or ‘spirits’, for they are both). With
these particles as intermediaries, the visibly separated limbs
and ·other· parts always retain a certain real unity and
sympathy [here = something like ‘co-ordination of events’], as many
examples show—two in particular. (1) A man with no nose
arranged to have a nose made for him from the ﬂesh of
another man, and fastened to him (like grafting a cutting
onto the trunk of a tree); when the other man died and his
body rotted, that nose also rotted and fell from the face of
the living man. (2) A surgeon amputated a man’s leg and
put it across the room from the body; the man was overcome
by pain, and pointed out where in the severed leg the pain
was; which clearly proves that the parts are in a certain
way united even when separated by some distance. Likewise
individuals of the same species may be united in a special
way even when they are distant from one another. [Our author
writes ‘individuals of the same species sive quae afﬁnitatem habent in
una specie’, which means ‘. . . or ones that have an afﬁnity in one species’.
This is hard to make sense of; and what happens two sentences further
on strongly suggests that the Latin translator slipped, and that what
Lady Conway meant was ‘. . . or ones that belong to different species but
have an afﬁnity’.] This is especially evident in the case of human
beings. If two people love each other very much, this love
unites them so closely that no distance can divide or separate
them; they are present to each other in spirit, so that a
continual ﬂow or emanation of spirits passes from one to the
other—uniting them, as it were roping them together. Thus,
anything that someone loves—another person, an animal, a
tree, silver, gold—is united with him, and his spirit goes out
into it. Incidentally, although an individual human being’s

35

Ancient and Modern Philosophy

Anne Finch, Viscountess Conway

7: Body and spirit: arguments 1–3

spirit is usually spoken of as one single thing, it is really
composed of many spirits—countless spirits—just as the
·human· body is composed of many bodies. The body’s parts
are organized into a certain ordered hierarchy; and this is
even more the case with the human spirit, that great army
of spirits that have their different functions under one spirit,
their commander. ·Summing up the past three pages:· It now
turns out that impenetrability and indivisibility are no more
essential attributes of body than of spirit, because taken in
one way these attributes apply to both body and spirit, while
taken in the other way they apply to neither.

One might oppose this inﬁnity of spirits in every spirit

and this inﬁnity of bodies as follows:

It has been written: ‘God made all things by number,
weight, and measure.’ So it can’t be the case that
an •innumerable multitude of spirits exists in one
human being or that an •innumerable multitude of
bodies exists in one ·human· body.

[That quotation comes from The Wisdom of Solomon 11:20. This is an
apocryphal biblical book, i.e. one of the books that were considered for
inclusion in the ofﬁcial Bible but didn’t make the cut.] [Lady Conway
replies that she didn’t mean ‘inﬁnite’ and ‘innumerable’
strictly literally: she was saying only that no thinking crea-
ture could put a number to those spirits and bodies. God
of course could number and measure them. She continues:]
It’s the nature of a creature that if it is to act and enjoy the
good that the Creator prepared for it, it can’t be merely
·To see that this is true, try to suppose that
singular.
it isn’t·. Let’s suppose there is one atom separated from
all fellow creatures. What can it do to perfect itself and
become greater or better? What can it see or hear or taste
or feel, either (1) within itself or (2) outside? (1) It can’t see,
hear, taste, or feel within itself, ·because that would involve
internal motion, and· it can’t have internal motion, because

that would involve its parts’ going from one arrangement to
another arrangement, whereas our atom is strictly singular
and doesn’t have parts. (2) It can’t see, hear, taste, or feel
any other creature, because for that it would have to receive
an image of that other creature within itself; and it can’t
do that because it’s only an atom and is so small that it
can’t receive anything inside itself. Just as the organs of
the external senses are made up of many parts, so are the
organs of the internal senses; so all knowledge requires
that the creature that has the knowledge, the subject of the
knowledge or its receptacle, consist of a variety or multitude
of things. I mean ‘all creaturely knowledge’, i.e. knowledge
that is received from or caused by the items that are known
(in contrast with God’s knowledge, which isn’t received from
or caused by creatures, but is basically his, coming from him
alone). We have knowledge of many different objects, each
of which sends us its own image; so we have many images
in us, each of them a real entity that needs a place ·within
us· that is right for its particular form and shape; and there
is no way that could be provided by an atom! If we didn’t
house images in that way, not only would confusion follow
but many things would be present one to another without
any extension, which is against the nature of a creature.
[The clause ‘many things. . . extension’ correctly translates the Latin; it is
offered with no sense of what our author is getting at here.] (Here is a
possible line of thought:

. . . .·You contend that· I am a multiple being who
receives many images from objects. Because of this
·supposed· multiplicity, if I know some one object I
should see it as if it were multiple—seeing many men
instead of just one, for example.

That is just wrong. ·A multiple knower doesn’t automatically
make what is known multiple, as the following two examples
show·. (a) When many people see one man, they don’t see

36

Ancient and Modern Philosophy

Anne Finch, Viscountess Conway

7: Body and spirit: arguments 1–3

him as many men but only as one, ·despite the fact that
they as a group are clearly multiple·.
(b) When I look at
something, I see it with my two eyes. . . .but what appears
to me is one thing, not two.
If I could see a horse or a
man, say, with ten thousand eyes instead of my actual two,
what appeared to me would be a single horse or man, no
more than that.) Our multiplicity seems to be the great
difference between God and creatures. He is one, and he has
the perfection of not needing anything from outside himself;
whereas a creature needs the help of its fellow creatures
and has to be multiple if it is to receive this help. ·I am not
here repeating my point about multiplicity and knowledge of
other things; my present point is speciﬁcally about receiving
help, or more precisely it is about receiving·. Whenever
something x receives something y, it is nourished by y which
thus becomes part of x. Therefore—·even supposing that
at the outset x is not multiple at all·—x is now no longer
one thing but many, at least as many as the things that it
receives. So creatures form a kind of social group devoted to
giving and receiving, where one creature x supports another
creature y so that y can’t live without x. What creature is
there anywhere that doesn’t need its fellow creatures? None!
Thus, every creature that has any life, sense, or motion must
be multiple or numerous, so much so that its multiplicity
outruns ·the counting or listing capacities of· every created
intellect, meaning that its multiplicity is in the everyday
sense of the term ‘inﬁnite’. Here’s another possible line of
thought:

A central or ruling spirit must be a single atom. Why
else would it qualify as a central or principal spirit

with dominion over all the rest?

That is wrong. The central, ruling, or principal spirit is
multiple, and I have already given the reason why ·it has
to be·. It qualiﬁes as central because all the other spirits
come together in it, just as lines from every part of the
circumference ·of a circle· meet in the centre and go out from
it. In fact, the spirits that make up this central predominant
spirit are more ﬁrmly and tenaciously held together than
are the other spirits, the ones that are like messengers or
executives for the principal spirit, the leader. This unity
·within the dominant spirit· is so great that nothing can
dissolve it (whereas most of the servant spirits, the ones that
aren’t parts of the central spirit, can come apart). That’s
how it comes about that the soul of every human being
will remain a whole soul for eternity, lasting for ever, so
that it may receive proper rewards for its labor. This is
required by the universal law of justice that •is inscribed in
everything requires this and •serves as an extremely strong
and unbreakable bond in keeping this unity ·among the
parts of the central or dominant spirit in a human being·.
Spirits that agreed and united in doing good or bad will be
rewarded or punished together—what can ﬁt inﬁnite justice
and wisdom better than that? And it can’t happen if they
are separated from each other. For the same reason, the
central spirit of every other creature is also indissoluble. New
central spirits are continually being formed in the production
of things, but no central spirit is dissolved; it can only be
further advanced or diminished according to its current
worthiness or unworthiness, capacity or incapacity.

37

Ancient and Modern Philosophy

Anne Finch, Viscountess Conway

8: Body and spirit: arguments 4–6

Chapter 8: Body and spirit: arguments 4–6

1. My fourth argument, to prove that spirit and body differ
not in essence but ·only· in degree is based on the intimate
union or bond that exists between spirits and bodies, by
means of which spirits control the bodies they are united
with, moving them around and using them as instruments
in their various operations. [The third argument began on page 30;
the ﬁfth begins on page 40.] If spirit and body are so opposite,
with opposite attributes:

•if spirit is alive—a living and perceiving substance—
whereas body is merely a dead mass, and
•if spirit is penetrable and indivisible, whereas body is
impenetrable and divisible

then tell me: What is it that unites and joins them so much?
What are the chains or ties that hold them together so ﬁrmly
and for so long? Also, when a spirit or soul gets separated
from ·its· body and no longer controls it or has power to move
it as before, what causes this separation? ·The philosophers
I am opposing· might reply:

The ·previous· union of the soul with the body was
caused by the vital ﬁt [vitalis congruitas] between them;
and when the body decomposes it stops vitally ﬁtting
the soul.

Then I ask them: what is this ·vital ﬁt·? If they can’t tell
us what it consists in, they are babbling, producing empty
words, ones with sound but no sense. ·And they surely can’t
answer my question satisfactorily·. In their understanding
of what body and spirit are, they don’t ﬁt one another in any
way at all; because ·in their view· body is always dead matter,
lacking life and perception, just as much when the spirit is
in it as after it leaves. And if there were some ﬁt between
them, then it would of course remain the same whether the

38

body was healthy or decomposed. My opponents may say:

Spirit requires an organized body to perform the vital
actions of the external senses and to move the body
from place to place; and organization is lacking in a
decomposed body.

But this doesn’t solve their difﬁculty. Why does spirit require
such an organized body? Why, for example, can the spirit see
only by means of such a wonderfully formed and organized
corporeal eye ·as we have·? Why does spirit need corporeal
light-rays if it’s to see corporeal objects? And why can’t
the soul see an object unless an image of it is transmitted
through the eye? If it is totally spirit and in no way body,
why does it need such a variety of corporeal organs that are
so greatly and deeply unlike it? And another thing: When
one •body x moves another body y, this involves y’s being
impenetrable and therefore resisting x; so how can a •spirit
move its body or any of its limbs if it is (as they say it is) of
such a nature that no part of the body can resist it in any
way? If a spirit so easily penetrates every body, why is it
that when it moves from place to place it doesn’t leave the
body behind, since it can so easily pass through it without
the least resistance?. . . . Think about what happens with
the sails of a ship. By means of them the wind drives the
ship along, and the driving force is lessened in proportion
as there are more openings, holes, and passages in the sails.
And if the sails were replaced by a giant net, the ship would
barely move, even in a gale. This shows us the ·essential·
role of impenetrability in motion; if body and spirit were not
mutually impenetrable, a spirit couldn’t cause any body to
move.

Ancient and Modern Philosophy

Anne Finch, Viscountess Conway

8: Body and spirit: arguments 4–6

2. Here is an objection that might be made to what I have
been saying:

God moves whatever bodies he pleases and is in-
deed the original cause of all movement, yet he is
completely incorporeal and is intimately present in all
bodies, with nothing impenetrable about him.

I answer that the motion by which God moves a body is
completely different from the way a soul moves the body.
The will of God that brought bodies into existence also made
them move; so all motion comes from God, through his
will. A creature can’t •move itself, any more than it can
•bring itself into existence; it is in God that we ‘live and
move and have our being’ (Acts 17:28). So motion and being
(·existence·) come from the same cause, God the creator: he
lavishes motion on creatures without moving himself; he
doesn’t go from place to place because he is equally present
everywhere. But the story of how the soul moves the body
is nothing like that. The soul isn’t the author of motion ·as
such·; it merely determines that this or that particular thing
moves. The soul moves from place to place with the body,
and if the body is imprisoned or chained down, the soul can’t
escape from the prison or the chains. It is very inappropriate
to liken •the motion of the body produced by the soul to •the
motion that all creatures get from God; it is on a par with
likening •a human builder’s activity of constructing a ship
or a house to •God’s activity of creating the ﬁrst substance
or matter. It is obvious that the two are very different: God
brought his creatures into existence, but a carpenter doesn’t
bring into existence the wood from which he builds a ship.
‘You say that the motions of every creature come from
God; so ·you must think that· he is or could be the author
or cause of sin.’ No-one will bring this against me. The
•power to move comes from God, but sin comes not from
him but from the creature that has misused this •power by

directing it to something other than it should. Thus sin is
ataxia [Greek], i.e. a disorderly direction of motion, or of the
power of moving, from where it ought to be to somewhere
else. Consider the example of a ship: that it moves at all
is due to the wind; that it moves to this place or that place
is due to the helmsman. The helmsman isn’t the author =
cause of the wind; but the wind is blowing and he uses it
well or badly. When he steers the ship to its destination, he
is praised, but when he wrecks it by running it onto rocks,
he is blamed and thought to deserve punishment.

Another point: Why does the spirit or soul suffer so much
when the body is harmed? If the spirit has nothing corporeal
about it ·even· when united to the body, why is it so upset
when the body—whose nature is ·allegedly· so different—is
damaged? If it’s so easy for the soul to penetrate the body,
how can any corporeal thing hurt it? ‘The soul doesn’t feel
the pain—only the body feels it’—that can’t be said by the
people ·against whom I am arguing in this chapter, i.e. the
ones· who afﬁrm that the body has no life or perception.
On the other hand, all the difﬁculties that I have presented
vanish if one accepts ·as I do· that the soul is of one nature
and substance with the body, although it is much more alive
and spiritual than the body, more swift and penetrable, and
so on through various other perfections. Given this account
of the situation, it is easy to grasp how the soul is united with
body, moves the body, suffers with the body and through the
body. [Lady Conway adds here a reference to a Kabbalah text
showing that ‘this was the opinion of the ancient Hebrews’.]

3. We can easily grasp how one body is united with an-
other through the true ﬁt between their natures. The most
ﬁnely divided and spiritual body can be united with a very
thick and lumpy body by means of certain bodies that are
intermediate between the two extremes—intermediate, that

39

Ancient and Modern Philosophy

Anne Finch, Viscountess Conway

8: Body and spirit: arguments 4–6

is, on the spectrum from very ﬁne-grained to very lumpy.
These intervening bodies are the ties or links through which
such a ﬁnely divided and spiritual soul is connected to such
a lumpy body. When these intermediate spirits are absent,
or stop work, the union is broken. On this basis we can
we easily grasp how a soul moves a body, just as one ﬁnely
divided body can move another thick and lumpy one. And
since a body is itself is a sentient living thing, i.e. a perceiving
substance, it is just as easy to grasp how one body can
wound or bring pain or pleasure to another body, because
things whose natures are the same or similar can easily
affect each other. And this line of thought can be used to
answer similar questions:

How do spirits move other spirits?
How do spirits contend or struggle with other spirits?
How do good spirits promote unity, harmony, and
friendship with each other?

·These things certainly do happen·: the select few who know
their own hearts learn from experience that there is such an
expulsion and struggle of spirits, especially of good spirits
against evil ones. ·And the question of how this can happen
seems to be unanswerable· if all spirits can be intimately
present within each other, for how ·in that case· can they
•contend with one another, •struggle to occupy a position,
•expel another? Someone might say this:

The spirits of God and Christ are intimately present
in everything, yet they wage war against the devil and
his spirits in the human heart,

I answer that it isn’t valid to compare God’s operations with
those of his creatures, because God’s ways are inﬁnitely
superior to ours. Still, one valid difﬁculty still remains,
·arising from this truth·:

When the spirits of God and Christ struggle against

the devil and the evil spirits in the human heart, they
unite with certain good spirits which they •sanctify
and •prepare for this union and •use as a vehicle—a
war-chariot—in their battle with wicked spirits.
In
struggling against the good spirits in the human heart,
the evil spirits are struggling against God and Christ.
The good spirits are those of the pious and faithful
person who used to be wicked and since then has been
made good. God and Christ help every •pious person
in the struggle to prevail over evil spirits; but God
allows evil spirits to conquer those that are •evil and
unfaithful. He helps only those who fear and love him,
and who obey him and believe in his power, goodness,
and truth. When he unites with these people, their
good spirits are like so many arrows and swords that
wound and drive back the dark and impure spirits.

The difﬁculty I spoke of is this: How can a human soul, even
one in the highest state of purity, be united with God, given
that God is pure spirit whereas the soul, though pure in
the highest degree, is always somewhat corporeal? I answer
that this happens through Jesus Christ, who is the true and
appropriate medium between the two. Christ can be united
with the soul ·immediately·, without the help of anything
coming between them, because of their great afﬁnity and
likeness. The learned men who say that the natures of body
and spirit are completely opposite can’t say that!

4. I take the ﬁfth argument from what we observe in all
visible bodies such as earth, water, stones, wood, etc. [The
fourth argument starts on page 38; the sixth is announced on page 42.]
What an abundance of spirits there are in all these things!
For earth and water continually produce animals, as they did
in the beginning; a pool full of water produces ﬁsh, without
any ﬁsh having been put there to breed. Since everything

40

Ancient and Modern Philosophy

Anne Finch, Viscountess Conway

8: Body and spirit: arguments 4–6

else comes from earth and water originally, it necessarily
follows that the spirits of all animals are in the water. That
is why Genesis says that the spirit of God hovered over the
face of the waters, so that from the waters he would bring
forth whatever was created afterwards.

A possible objection to that argument goes like this:

Your argument doesn’t prove that all spirits are
bodies—only that all bodies contain the spirits of
all animals.
[Note ‘all animals’; it will become important in
a moment.] Now, granted that every body has a spirit
in it, and that the spirit and the body are united,
their natures are still different so that they can’t be
changed into each other.

I reply that if every body, even the smallest, has in itself the
spirits of all animals and other things, just as matter is said
to have all forms within itself, does it have all these spirits in
it (a) actually or only (b) potentially? If (a), the question arises:
how can so many spirits. . . .actually exist in their different
essences in a small body (even in the smallest conceivable)?
It couldn’t happen unless the spirits were intimately present
·to the parts of the body, so that they didn’t take up any
space·. But a capacity for intimate presence is something
that no creature can have, as I have already shown [see
page 33]. Also, if spirits of all kinds exist in each body, even
the smallest, how does it happen that this kind of animal is
produced from this ·kind of· body and not from that? Why
doesn’t a single body give rise immediately to all kinds of
animals? We know from experience that this doesn’t happen,
and that nature does everything systematically, with one
kind of animal being formed from another and one species
coming from another, whether rising to a higher perfection
or sinking to a lower one. If on the other hand the answer
is (b) that all ·kinds of· spirits, with their different essences,
are contained in each body not actually but only potentially,

then ·the objection to my position collapses because· the
answer (b) implies that the body and all those spirits are
the same, i.e. that body can be changed into those spirits
(compare ’Wood is potentially ﬁre’, i.e. can be changed into
ﬁre, and ‘water is potentially air’, i.e. can be changed into
air, and so on). ·And the thesis that bodies can be changed
into spirits is precisely what I am here defending·.

·And when the present objector concedes that bodies
always have or contain spirits, I use this concession as the
basis for another argument against him·. If spirits and bodies
are so inseparably united to each other that no body can be
without spirit, indeed without many spirits, this ·in itself· is
surely a weighty argument that they are of one basic nature
and substance. Otherwise, it would be incomprehensible to
us that they wouldn’t eventually separate from each other in
various strange dissolutions and separations. . . .

Last point: How does it happen that when a body decom-
poses, other species are generated from this mess? Thus
animals come forth from decomposing water or earth; even
rocks, when they rot, turn into animals; and mud or other
decomposing matter generates animals, all of which have
spirits. How does the rotting or decomposing of a body lead to
animals’ being newly generated? You might try this answer:
What happens is that this decomposition, this process
of rotting, releases the spirits of these animals from
their chains, so to speak, freeing them to form and
shape new bodies for themselves from the rotted
matter by means of their plastic natures.

[Henry More, a close friend and philosophical tutor of Lady Conway,
invented ‘plastic natures’ as a go-between enabling spirits to act on
bodies; he was Cartesian enough to hold that spirit and body have
nothing signiﬁcant in common.
In putting the phrase into the mouth
of an opponent, Lady Conway underlines a fact that has been obvious
almost from the start of this work, namely that despite her admiration

41

Ancient and Modern Philosophy

Anne Finch, Viscountess Conway

8: Body and spirit: arguments 4–6

and gratitude towards More she is decisively parting company from him.]
I reply, how did the body in its prime—·before it started
to rot·—so strongly hold those spirits captive? By being
hard and dense? If so, then those ·imprisoned· spirits are
nothing but ﬁnely divided bodies; otherwise the hardness
and denseness of the body couldn’t lock them in. If a spirit
·were capable of being intimately present within a body, so
that it· could penetrate the hardest body as easily as the
softest, it could as easily go from one body to another with no
need for decomposition or death to generate new life. So the
fact, ·if it is a fact·—that spirits are held captive in certain
hard bodies and are liberated when the bodies become soft
is a clear argument that spirit and body have the same basic
nature, that body is nothing but ﬁxed and condensed spirit,
and spirit nothing but ﬁnely divided or volatile body.

5. This is the place to mention the following facts. In all
hard bodies—ordinary pebbles and precious stones, metals,
herbs, trees, animals, and all human bodies—there are many
spirits that are •imprisoned (so to speak) in dense bodies
and •united with them, unable to come out and ﬂy away into
other bodies until death or dissolution occurs. There are
also many other very ﬁnely divided spirits that do continually
come out of these hard bodies; it’s because they are so
ﬁnely divided that they can’t be held in by the hardness of
the bodies they inhabit; and these ﬁnely divided spirits are
productions. . . .of the lumpier spirits detained in the body.
The latter spirits, though trapped in the body, are not idle in
their prison: the body is a kind of workshop for them, where
they make the more ﬁnely divided spirits that are then given
off in colours, sounds, odours, tastes, and various other
properties and powers. So the hard body and the spirits
it contains are like the mother of the more ﬁnely divided
spirits, their ‘children’. That is nature’s way: it always works

towards more complete ﬁne-grainedness and spirituality,
because that is the most natural property of every operation
and motion. All motion grinds a thing down and divides it,
thereby making it ‘subtle’ and spiritual. In the human body,
for example, food and drink are ﬁrst changed into chyle and
then into blood, and after that into spirits, which are nothing
but perfectly ﬁne-spun blood; and these spirits, whether
good or bad, always move on to an ·even· greater degree of
‘subtlety’ or spirituality. Through the spirits that come from
blood •we see, hear, smell, taste, touch, and feel; through
them indeed we also •think, love, hate, and do everything we
do; they are the source of •the seed through which the race
propagates, and especially of •the human voice and speech,
which is full of those good or bad spirits formed in the heart.
As Christ taught: ‘The mouth speaks out of the abundance of
the heart. A good man out of the good treasure of the heart
·And Christ
brings forth good things’ (Matthew 12:34–5).
also said·:
‘Nothing that enters a man from without can
deﬁle him; what can deﬁle a man are the things that come
out of him’ (Mark 7: 15). . . .
6. And these are men’s angels or ministering spirits—the
ones Christ is speaking of when he says of the little ones who
believe in him ‘Their angels look upon the face of my heavenly
father’ (Matthew 18: 10). There are also other angels, good
and bad, that come to men; but the ones I am talking about
here are the angels that belong speciﬁcally to human beings,
the angels of believers who become like little children.
7. I draw the sixth and ﬁnal argument from certain texts of
both the old and new testaments, which show in clear and
explicit words that everything has life and is truly alive in
some degree. [The ﬁfth argument starts on page 40.]
•‘He gives to everything life and breath’ etc. (Acts 17:25)
•‘God makes everything live.’ (1 Timothy 6:13.

42

Ancient and Modern Philosophy

Anne Finch, Viscountess Conway

9: Other philosophers. Light. Life

•‘He is not called the God of the dead but of the living’ (Luke
20:38.

(This last is being said primarily about human beings, but
it is a more general truth that, holding for everything else as
well.) He is indeed the God of all the things—human beings
included—that are resurrected and regenerated in their own
kind. ·I speak of ‘resurrection’· because the death of those

things isn’t their •annihilation but a •change from one kind
or degree of life to another.
[The problem here is present in the
Latin: things that are resurrected ‘in their kind’ (in sua specie) undergo
a change of kind (ab una specie. . . in aliam.] And thus the apostle
declares the resurrection of the dead and illustrates it with
the example of a grain of wheat that falls to the ground, dies,
and rises again as something fruitful (John 12: 24).

Chapter 9: Other philosophers. Light. Life

1. From what I have just said, and from various reasons
I offered earlier for the view that spirit and body are ba-
sically one and the same, it plainly appears that the so-
called philosophers, both ancient and modern, who taught
otherwise were comprehensively wrong. They built on weak
foundations, so that their entire structure ·of philosophical
theory· is shaky and is so useless that it is bound to collapse
eventually. From this absurd foundation many extremely
crass and dangerous errors have arisen—in theology as well
as in philosophy—

with great injury to the human race,
to the detriment of true piety, and
in contempt of God’s glorious name.

You’ll easily see that I am right about this, from what I have
already said and from what I’ll say in this chapter.

2. Don’t object that this philosophy ·of mine· is nothing

but Cartesianism or Hobbesianism wearing a new mask. ·My
philosophy differs from theirs in much more than a ‘mask’.
There is a solid doctrinal difference, which I shall explore
in this and the next three sections, and then a conceptual
difference that I’ll take up in section 6·. Firstly, the Carte-
sian philosophy claims that body is nothing but dead stuff
which not only now does but for all eternity must lack life and
perception of every kind. Anyone must be guilty of this great
error if he says that body and spirit are contrary things and
can’t change into one another, thereby denying bodies all life
and perception. This is ﬂatly contrary to the fundamentals
of my philosophy. Far from being •Cartesianism with a
new mask, my philosophy’s basic principles entitle it rather
to be called •anti-Cartesianism. Undeniably, Descartes
taught many ﬁne and ingenious things about the mechanical
aspects of natural processes and about how all movements
conform to regular mechanical laws. He depicts nature—i.e.

43

Ancient and Modern Philosophy

Anne Finch, Viscountess Conway

9: Other philosophers. Light. Life

the created world—as operating in accordance with the
practised skill and mechanical wisdom that God, the source
of all wisdom, has given it! That’s all very well and good,
but many of nature’s operations are far more than merely
mechanical. Nature is not simply an organic body like a
clock, that has no vital principle [see note on page 24] of motion
in it. It is a living body that has life and perception, which are
much more exalted than a mere mechanism or a mechanical
motion.

3. Secondly, as for Hobbesianism,

it is even more
contrary to my philosophy than Cartesianism. For Descartes
recognized that God is clearly an immaterial and incorporeal
spirit, whereas Hobbes claims that God is material and
corporeal, indeed, that he is nothing but matter and body.
Thus he confounds God and creatures in their essences
and denies that there is an essential difference between
them. These and many other things are and have been
called the worst consequences of the philosophy of Hobbes,
to which one may add that of Spinoza. For he confounds
God and creatures and makes one being of both, all of that
is diametrically opposed to our philosophy.
4. Yet the weak and false principles of those men who
have dared to challenge the so-called philosophy of Hobbes
and Spinoza have conceded far too much to them and
against themselves. Thus not only have they not effectively
refuted their adversaries, but have also exposed themselves
to ridicule and contempt. Furthermore, if someone objects
that our philosophy seems to be similar to that of Hobbes at
least in this respect, that

it maintains that •all creatures were originally one
substance from the lowest and most ignoble to the
highest and most noble and from the smallest reptile,

44

worm, and ﬂy to the most glorious angel, indeed,
from the ﬁnest grain of dust and sand to the most
exalted of all creatures, from which it follows that
•every creature is material and corporeal, indeed, that
matter and every body, and consequently their noblest
actions, are material and corporeal or ﬂow from some
corporeal design,

I concede that all creatures from the lowest to the highest
were originally one substance and consequently could con-
vert and change from one nature to another. And although
Hobbes says the same thing, nevertheless this is not at all
prejudicial to the truth; nor are other parts of that philosophy
necessarily Hobbesian, where Hobbes says something true.
5. Moreover, far from being a help to him in his errors,
this principle ·of the inter-changeability of spirit and matter
strongly refutes his philosophy.
[What comes next starts ‘For
example. . . ’, but it isn’t an example of the thesis that this principle
of Hobbes’s can be used against him. That thesis, indeed, seems to
disappear without trace.] For example, Hobbesians argue that
all things are one [here = ‘of one kind’] because we see that
•all visible things can change into one another, •that all
visible things can change into invisible things (as when water
becomes air and most of a piece of burning wood turns into
something that is so ﬁnely divided that we can’t see it; and
•that invisible things become visible (as when water appears
from air, and so on). Hobbes infers from these facts that
nothing is so lowly that it can’t reach the highest level, ·from
which he infers that everything, including God, is corporeal·.

Ancient and Modern Philosophy

Anne Finch, Viscountess Conway

9: Other philosophers. Light. Life

Wanting to rebut this argument, Hobbes’s adversaries
generally deny its premise and assert on the contrary that
nothing of any sort can change into something of another
sort. What about burning wood? Many of them say that
the wood is composed of two substances, namely matter
and form, and that in combustion the matter remains the
same but the form of wood is destroyed and replaced in this
matter by a new form, the form of ﬁre. Thus, according
to them, real substances are continually being annihilated
and new ones being produced. But this is so foolish that
many others ·of Hobbes’s opponents· refuse to take that
line about wood’s changing into ﬁre and then into smoke
and ash; ·that is, they accept that wood does change into
ﬁre and then into smoke and ash·. But the error that they
avoid in that case they still persevere with in other cases, e.g.
denying that wood ·sometimes· changes into some animal.
(·I call this an ‘error’ because· we often see living creatures
being born from rotting wood or dung.· According to these
anti-Hobbesians, wood is mere matter, lifeless and incapable
of life or perception; so a living perceiving animal must have
its life from somewhere else, and must have a spirit or soul
that isn’t •part of the body or •produced by the body, but
is •sent into it. If they are asked ‘Where is this spirit sent
from? who sends it? why is this body sent a spirit of this
sort rather than some other?’, they are stuck and are wide
open to ·attack by· their adversaries.

A stronger case against the philosophies of Hobbes and
Spinoza can be made on the basis of my philosophy, which
accepts their premise that all kinds of creatures can be
changed into one another, so that the lowest can become the
highest and what was initially the highest can be become the
lowest. (Not that this can happen randomly. Species-change
occurs according to the pattern and order that the divine
wisdom has arranged, limiting what can be immediately

changed into what—A must be changed into B before it can
change into C, and must be changed into C before it can
change into D, etc.)

But I deny the conclusion that God and creatures are
one ·kind of· substance. There are changes of all creatures
from one species to another—from stone to earth, earth to
grass, grass to sheep, sheep to human ﬂesh, human ﬂesh
to the lowest spirits of man and from these to the noblest
spirits—but this ascent can’t go as high as God, whose
nature inﬁnitely surpasses all creatures, even ones that have
risen to the highest level. The nature of God is unchangeable
in every way and doesn’t admit the slightest shadow of
change; whereas every creature is naturally changeable.
6. Secondly, when someone objects against my philosophy
that it agrees with Hobbes in holding that every creature
is material and corporeal. . . ., I reply that by ‘material’ and
‘corporeal’, or by ‘matter’ and ‘body’, I mean something very
different from Hobbes. What I mean is something that
didn’t occur to Hobbes or Descartes except in a dream.
What. . . .attributes do they ascribe to these? Only exten-
sion and impenetrability; ·there’s no need to add· mobility
and the capacity to have a shape ·because these· are re-
ducible to extension. And extension and impenetrability
are really only one attribute [for our author’s defence of this
see page 32]; but even if we pretend that these are distinct
attributes, this won’t help us to understand what this
remarkable substance is that is called ‘body’ and ‘matter’.
They—·these philosophers·—stop at the husk, the shell, and
don’t penetrate to the kernel. They only touch the surface,
never glimpsing the centre. For they know nothing and
understand nothing concerning the most noble attributes of
the substance that they call ‘matter’ and ‘body’.

What are these more excellent attributes? They are spirit
or life and light, by which I mean the capacity for every kind

45

Ancient and Modern Philosophy

Anne Finch, Viscountess Conway

9: Other philosophers. Light. Life

of feeling, perception, or knowledge, even love, all power and
virtue, joy and fruition, that the noblest creatures have or
can have, even the vilest and most contemptible. [Lady Conway
may mean

(i) spirit and (ii) life and light, or
(i) spirit, i.e. life and (ii) light.

The Latin doesn’t enable us to pick one of these as right.]

Indeed, dust can go through a series of transmutations
that will give it all these perfections. If this series happens
according to the natural order of things, it will require a long
time to complete; though God with his absolute power can
if he wishes speed the series up so that the dust-to-nobility
change happens in a single moment. But ·he doesn’t do
that, because· his wisdom sees that it’s more ﬁtting for
events to occur in their natural course and order, so that the
changing beings can achieve the maturity that God confers
on every being, and so that creatures can have the time
they need to acquire through their own efforts ever greater
perfection as instruments of divine wisdom, goodness, and
power. . . . They get more pleasure from possessing what they
have as the fruits of their labour ·than they would get from
having them handed to them on a plate, so to speak·. The
capacity to acquire these higher perfections is an altogether
different attribute from life and perception, and these are
altogether different from extension and shape. [The words ‘and
these are’ correspond to a gap in the Latin, but it’s pretty clear that this
was the intended meaning.] And so (·coming back now to my
present theme·) the activities that constitute life are clearly
•different from mechanical motion—motion from place to
place—though they aren’t •separable from it because they
always use mechanical motion as their instrument, at least
in all their dealings with other creatures.

7. I have said that life and shape are different attributes of
one substance. ·Let us look at some facts about shape, which

can serve as a kind of explanatory metaphor concerning life·.
(1) A single body can change into shapes of every sort, and
when it changes from a less perfect to a more perfect shape,
the latter includes the former. Consider a triangular prism:
of all the solid straight-line shapes that a body can acquire,
this comes ﬁrst [because it has only four faces; every other solid
straight-line shape has more]. From this a body can change into
a cube, which is a more perfect shape that includes the
prism. From the cube it can change into another still more
perfect shape, one that is nearer to being a sphere, and from
this into yet another that is even closer to perfection and
so on. Thus the body ascends from less to more perfect
shapes—to inﬁnity, for there are no limits. . . . (2) But this
body consisting of straight lines on a plane can never attain
the perfection of a sphere, although it can approximate to it
without limit. Now, (1’) in a closely analogous way a single
body can change from one degree ·or level· of life to a more
perfect one, which will always includes the former, and this
can continue without limit: the scale of degrees of life has
a beginning but no end, ·i.e. there is a lowest level of life
but no highest level·. (2’) But a creature can never attain
equality with God, although it can come close and closer to
him without limit. God’s inﬁnity is always more perfect than
the highest level a creature can reach, just as a sphere is the
most perfect of all other ﬁgures that no ﬁgure can reach.

8. Thus shape and life are distinct but not incompatible
attributes of a single substance. Shape serves the operations
of life. We see this in the bodies of humans and lower
animals: the shape of the eye serves sight, the shape of
the ear serves hearing, the shapes of the mouth, teeth, lips,
and tongue serve speech, the shape of the hands and ﬁngers
serves manual activities, and the shape of the feet serves
walking. In the same way the shapes of all the other parts of

46

Ancient and Modern Philosophy

Anne Finch, Viscountess Conway

9: Other philosophers. Light. Life

the body contribute greatly to the vital operations that the
spirits perform in that body. Indeed, the shape of the entire
·human· body is more suitable than any other shape that
could exist or that could be made for the proper functioning
of human life. Consequently, shape and life coexist extremely
well in one substance or body, where shape is an instrument
of life without which no vital operation could be performed.

9. Similarly, mechanical motion—i.e. the moving of a body
from one place to another—is a mode or operation that is
•distinct from the •processes of life, though they are insep-
arable. Life-processes couldn’t occur without any motion,
because motion is an instrument of those processes. For
example, the eye can’t see unless light enters into it, i.e.
moves into it; this motion starts up the life-process in the eye
that constitutes vision. And the same applies to all the other
life processes all through the body. A life process is a far
more noble and divine way of operating than ordinary motion,
yet both come together in one substance and cooperate well
with each other. ·When you see a hawk, for example·, :

The eye receives light into itself from the hawk, and
the eye sends out light or spirit to the hawk.

In this light and spirit there is the life process that unites
the hawk with eyesight.

So Hobbes and those of his party err gravely when they
maintain that sense and perception are nothing but the
mutual reactions of particular bodies, with ‘reaction’ being
understood as meaning nothing but ordinary local motion
[i.e. motion from place to place]. In fact, sense and perception are
far nobler—far more divine—than any mechanical motion
of particles. A vital motion or ·life· process occurs when
one item uses another as an instrument that serves to start
up a life process in the subject or percipient. And it can
be transmitted from one body to another, just as ordinary

motion can, even when the bodies are far apart, so that
distant bodies can be united without any new movement
of body or matter. Think about what happens when an
extremely long plank is pushed southwards from its northern
end: the southern end has to move also; and this action ·of
one end on the other· runs the length of the plank without
any particles of matter being sent from one to the other; the
plank itself is sufﬁcient to transmit this motion. Well, in
the same way a vital process can travel (accompanied by
ordinary motion) from one thing to another—even at a great
distance—when there’s a suitable medium to transmit it.
What we see here is a kind of divine spirituality or ﬁneness
of grain in every motion and every life process; we see it
in the fact of intimate presence [see explanation on page 33].
As I said earlier, no •created substance is capable of this,
and yet every •motion and action—·including the actions of
life processes·—is capable of it. That’s because a motion or
an action isn’t a material thing or substance but rather a
state that a substance is in, or a property that it has; so
it is intimately present in the substance that has it, and
that makes it possible for motion to pass from one body
to another even at a great distance, if there is a suitable
medium to transmit it. And the stronger the motion, the
further it can reach. When a stone is thrown into still water,
it causes a motion that makes ever larger ·and ever fainter·
circles until they are no longer visible to us; and no doubt it
goes on after that making more ·and even larger· circles that
we can’t see because of the dullness of our senses. How long
this goes on depends on the force of the initial splash. This
motion is transmitted from the centre to the circumference
without any body or substance to carry it from the stone.

In the same way, external light—an action or motion
caused by a luminous body—can be transmitted through
water, glass, crystal, or any other transparent body.
I

47

Ancient and Modern Philosophy

Anne Finch, Viscountess Conway

9: Other philosophers. Light. Life

wouldn’t be surprised if all luminous bodies were continually
giving off an abundance of ﬁnely divided matter, so that
the whole substance of a burning candle is given off in that
way. . . . The light we receive from a candle (say) can be
increased by a crystal where these ﬁnely divided outputs
of the candle can be compressed [the rest of this sentence
is omitted, because the preparer of this text can’t make
good sense of it; nor, it seems, could any of the previous
translators; in case you are interested, it is this: ne transeant
ad minimum in tanta abundantia, quae sufﬁciat ad commu-
nicandum totum lumen]. Although it is very hard and solid,
a crystal transmits light very easily. How can it receive so
many bodies and transmit them through itself, when other
bodies that are not as hard or solid can’t do this? Wood,
for example, is not as hard or solid as crystal, yet crystal
·To explain this, we have
is transparent and wood isn’t.
to grasp that the question was wrongly stated in the ﬁrst
place. It is not true that when light shines through a crystal
it ‘transmits [bodies] through itself’; if it did that, the bodies
in question would presumably pass through pores in the
crystal·. Wood is certainly more porous than crystal because
it is less solid, but ·this isn’t relevant to our present question
because· light doesn’t go through the pores of crystal but
through its very substance. The light doesn’t grind its way
into the crystal or thicken it; rather, it acts by means of
intimate presence, because light isn’t a substance, a body,
but is pure action or motion. And so it is that light goes
through crystal and not through wood because crystal is a
more suitable medium than wood for receiving the motion
that we call ‘light’. There’s a great variety of motions and
operations of bodies, and each of them can be passed on only
through its own special medium. That makes it easy for us to
grasp that motion can pass through various bodies by a kind
of penetration that is different from anything that any portion

of matter, however ﬁnely divided, can accomplish—namely
by its intimate presence. And if merely place-to-place or
mechanical motion can do this, then a vital process, which
is a nobler kind of motion, can do it even better. And if it can
penetrate the bodies through which it passes by means of its
intimate presence, then it can be transmitted from one body
to another instantaneously. I mean that the motion or action
itself doesn’t need any time for transmission. In contrast
with that, the kind of transmission in which a body is carried
from place to place must take some time; how much time
depends on the kind of body it is and the speed of the motion
that transfers it.

Thus we see how every motion and action, considered in
the abstract, has a marvelous subtlety or spirituality beyond
all created substances, so that neither time nor place can
limit them. Yet motion and action are nothing but states or
properties of created substances—like strength, power, and
force—through which motion and action can be magniﬁed
beyond what the substance itself can do.
[When Lady Conway and her contemporaries speak of matter as ‘subtle’,
they mean that it is ﬁnely divided (that is indeed the primary meaning of
the Latin subtilis); but in the above paragraph she writes as though her
view were something like this:

To call some matter ‘subtle’ is to say something about how easily
it can penetrate, get into and out of tight corners, and so on.
What makes a portion of matter subtle, in this sense, is its being
very ﬁnely divided; but that’s not what subtlety is. Something
might be subtle and yet not be ﬁnely divided because it isn’t a
portion of matter. An example of this is motion.

Perhaps that is her position all through, but the translation of subtilis
by ‘ﬁnely divided’ will be allowed to stand. As for our author’s use of
‘spirituality’ in this paragraph, there seems to be no way of rescuing
that, because she has said, explicitly and often, that spirits are on a
continuum with bodies, an item’s place on the continuum depending
purely on how ﬁnely divided it is. She can’t now speak of motion as
having an extreme position on that continuum.]

48

Ancient and Modern Philosophy

Anne Finch, Viscountess Conway

9: Other philosophers. Light. Life

This puts us in a position to distinguish •material
extension from •virtual extension; every created thing has
both. The material extension of a portion of matter—a body, a
corporeal substance—is the extension that can be attributed
to it without reference to any motion or action. A body’s
material extension is always the same, rather than being
bigger at some times than at others. A creature’s •virtual
extension ·at a given time· is its motion or action ·at that
time·. [In the interests of clarity, the rest of this paragraph re-orders
the original; but it doesn’t add to or subtract from what Lady Conway
wrote here.] There are three different possible sources for the
motion or action that a creature x has. It may have

(1) been given to x immediately by God,
(2) come from x’s own inner being, or
(3) been given to x immediately by some other created
thing.

Any action in category (1), coming from God, who is also
the source of x’s existence, is natural to x and is its own
action because it is a consequence of its essence. An action
in category (2) is x’s own in a stricter sense. The difference
between (2) and (3) is labelled as the difference between
‘internal motion’ and ‘external motion’. When this external
motion tries to move x to a place to which it has no natural
inclination to go, this motion is violent and unnatural—e.g.
when a stone is thrown up into the air. Any such unnatural
and violent motion is clearly a case of ordinary place-to-place
motion, mechanical motion, and in no way vital, because it
doesn’t come from x’s life. Every motion that comes from x’s
own life and will is vital, and I call it the motion of life [using a
phrase that in this version has generally been translated by ‘life process’];
it isn’t mere place-to-place or mechanical motion, but has in
itself life and vital power. This is x’s virtual extension, which
is greater or lesser ·at different times· according to the kind
or degree of life with which x is endowed ·at those times·.

For when a creature attains a more noble kind or degree of
life, it acquires greater power and ability to move itself and
transmit its vital motions to the greatest distance.

There is much debate about how •a motion can be trans-
mitted from one body to another, since it is certainly not a
substance or a body ·that could be transmitted in the way,
for instance, that I transmit •a book by handing it to you·.
If it is only a mode [= ‘state or property’] of the body, how can
this motion go from being a motion of body y to being a
motion of body x? ·Apparently it can’t do so·, because a
mode of body y is essentially in y, ·so that it can’t possibly
come to be in x instead·.
I think the best answer to this
objection is as follows. There isn’t a place-to-place movement
of this motion from one body to another; motion itself isn’t
moved—it moves the body in which it exists.
(If motion
did get from one body to another by being moved across,
that would involve a second motion to move the ﬁrst; this
second motion would be communicated by a third, and so
on to inﬁnity, which is absurd.) When one created thing
y communicates motion to another created thing x, what
happens is that y’s motion enables it to produce motion in x.
You could say that y creates motion in x; but this is the only
sort of creation that created things are capable of. It isn’t the
creation of a new substance, though it may be the creation
of a new kind of thing; and it is what ·basically· happens
when creatures are multiplied in their own kind—·e.g. in the
generation of animals·. . . .

We now have the materials for an easy response to all the
arguments that some people have used in an attempt to show
that a body is altogether incapable of sense or perception.
For this we have only to apply what I have said about the
attributes of the body:

• It has not only quantity and shape but also life.
• It can be moved not only mechanically in the from-

49

Ancient and Modern Philosophy

Anne Finch, Viscountess Conway

9: Other philosophers. Light. Life

place-to-place manner but also vitally.
•It can transmit its vital actions wherever it wants,
provided it has a suitable medium.
•Lacking such a medium, it can extend itself by send-
ing out ﬁnely divided parts of itself, which serve as an
excellent medium for receiving and transmitting its
vital processes.

And it’s easy to show how a body gradually attains the
perfection of having sense and perception—so that it is

capable not only of perception and knowledge such as the
lower animals have but of whatever perfection can be had
by any human being or angel. So we can understand ·and
believe· Christ’s statement that ‘God can raise up children
to Abraham from stones’ (Matthew 3: 9), ·taking it perfectly
literally and· not as a forced metaphor.
It would be the
greatest presumption to deny that God’s omnipotence gives
him the power to raise up the sons of Abraham from pebbles.

50


